Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 






I 



fi 



h- 



I 



^ 



ii 



Left Wing'' Communism: 

An Infantile Disorder 









/ 
BY N. LENIN 






AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION 

THE MARXIAN EDUCATIONAL SOCIETY 

5041 Jos. Cunpan Art., Dttroit, Mich. 

1931 



k> 




r 






i 



LabadM I 






/ 

/ 



'5 



\. 







TABLE OF CONTENTS. 

t 

' Page 

Introduction 7 



\ 



V 



Chapter I — In What Sense Can We Speak of the Inter- 
national Significance of the Russian Revolution 13 

Chapter II — One of the Principal Conditions of the SucT- 
cess of the Bolsheviks 16 

-Chapter III — The Chief Stages in the History of Bol- 
shevism 20 

Chapter IV — Who Were the Enemies in the Working-class 
Movement in the Struggle Against Whom Bolshevism 
Grew, Gained Strength and Became Hardened? 26 

Chapter V — "Left" Communism in Germany. Leaders — 
Party — Classes — The Masses 34 

Chapter VI — Should Revolutionaries Work in Reactionary 
Trade Union? 42 

Chapter VII — Should We Participate in Bourgeois Parlia- 
ments? 52 

Chapter VIII — No Compromise Whatever? dZ 

Chapter IX — "Left" Communism in Great Britain 75 

Chapter X — Some Conclusions 89 

Appendix 104 

Apendix I — The Split of the German Communist Party... 105 

Appendix II — Communists and Independents in Germany. 107 

Appendix III — Turati & Co. in Italy 110 

Appendix IV — Incorrect Conclusions Drawn from Correct 
Premises '. 112 

Appendix V — Letter 117 



c 



r 




^ 



V 



^. 




INTRODUCTION 

This work by Comrade Lenin shares a position of equal 
importance with that of any of the works that he has pre- 
sented to the movement. Viewed from a tactical angle, its 
value can not be over-estimated. In the books, etc., that have 
previously come to hand from Lenin, we have generally had 
a statement of tactical principles, but in this work we find a 
more detailed applic-ation of these principles to the concrete 
struggle. Therefore, this book has a great value as an aid to 
the understanding of the principles that have guided this great 
Marxian in his activity in the Russian Revolution. 

It is important to note that Comrade Lenin makes no ex- 
travagant claims for the Russian Revolution as a guide to the 
revolution in other lands. Those that have aimed at following 
every step of the Russian Revolution will find small consola- 
tion in this volume. However, he says: "One must admit 
some fundamental features of our revolution to be of such 
international significance.'' There is no doubt that the Russian 
Revolution is properly the guide for the Communist elements ^v 
of the world and many of the secondary as well as funda- * \ 
mental features of the revolution will find their place in the 
international revolution. But it would be "erroneous not to 
keep in liiind that, after the proletarian revolution in at least 
one of the advanced countries, things will in all probability 
take a shafp turn ; Russia will cease to be the model, and will 
become again the backward (in the 'Soviet' and Socialist 
sense) country." 

The various factions . of "Left" Communists with whom 
Lenin deals have their replicas in America and we can learn 
considerable by correctly relating this book to American con- 
ditions. We, too, have our "Left" Communists who refused 
to work with the conservative and backward elements in the 



4 



1 Lj 




I 



\ 

V 

"Reactionary Trade Unions." If the Bolsbeviki could work 
with the conservative Trade Unions in Russia it is more than 
correct that we can and must work with them here. There 
were more reasons for the organization of "new, spick and 
span 'Workers' Unions/ guihless of bourgeois-democratic 
prejudices, guiltless of craft feeling and narrow professional- 
ism" in Russia than there is, for doing the same thing in the 
United States at this time. When the Bolsheviki became a 
factor in Russia the Trade Union movement was a negligible 
quantity. In fact as late as the Third Trade Union Conference 
in 1917 only 1,475,249 workers were represented. This organ- 
ization, in itself, could not have been much of an obstacle to 
the organization of "pure" unions by the Bolsheviki. If this 
_ movement of less than a million and a half workers was con- 

sidered to be the mass movement of a country of one hundred 
and eighty-five million population, how much more so is it 
true that the mass movement of America is made up of an 
organization of four million workers in the American Fed- 
eration of Labor? Upon the face of it, it would appear that 
this principle of working within reactionary unions would 
apply to America and unless we have evidence that it is un- 
sound in its application to conditions here, one is justified in 
assuming that it does. This, of course, will be hard for some 
elements in America to swallow and considerable discussion 
and controversy will occur in the movement in the United 
/ States before this is finally settled. We have to admit that 

f Lenin is correct when he says : "There can be no doubt that 

Messrs. Gompers, Jouhaux, Henderson, Legien, etc., are very 
grateful to such *Left' revolutionaries who, like the German 
*Opposition-in-principle' Party (Heaven, preserve us from 
such 'principles') or like revolutionaries in the American 
'Industrial Workers of the World,' preach the necessity of 
quitting reactionary Trade Unions and of refusing to work 
in them.'* 

Lenin's position upon participation in Bourgeois Parlia- 
ments is even more decided and apparently more directly 
applicable to American conditions. He demonstrates that the 
parliament was not outworn in Germany upon the basis that 
it was still able to attract the workers to its support. He asks : 



i.,, ■ ■) -I I— . — -- — . — . — , — . __» — ^ .^, , ., ... ^t 



y 



^ 



"How is it possible to say that 'parliamentarism is politically 
worn out' when 'millions' and 'l^ions' of proletarians not \ 

only stand up for parliamentarism generally, but are directly 
counter-revolutionary?" If this position of participation in 
parliaments is correct in Germany, it is much more so in 
America. Here the workers not only stand up for parliaments 
generally but also are counter-revolutionary. Less than two 
million of the workers in this country were sufficiently awake 
at the last election (1920) to break away from the so-called 
old parties. In the face of this it seems apparent that it is 
necessary to take a revolutionary use of the bourgeois parlia- 
ments in this country. Boycotting of elections appears to be 
permissible only under unusual circumstances which seldom, 
if ever, arise in countries where parliamentary institutions are 
highly developed. Certainly no reasons have been shown for 
the boycotting of elections in the United States by those advo- 
cating such boycott. "It is just because, in Western Europe, the 
backward masses of the workers and the smaller peasantry 
are much more strongly imbued with bourgeois-democratic and 
parliamentary prejudices than they are in Russia, that it is 
only in the midst of such institutions as bourgeois parliaments 
that Communists can and should carry on their long and stub- 
born struggle to expose, disperse and overcome these preju- 
dices, stopping at nothing." 

For academicians within our movement in America this 
book should contain some good food for thought. Commun- 
ism appears here as a fighting organization full of work, full 
of life. Within its folds there is no room for those mental 
eunuchs who can produce no offspring in revolutionary action. 
The intricate philosophic points of Communism are something 
more than mental gymnastics with which to exercise one's 
minds. They are a guide to action ! Those that cannot trans- 
late Commimism' into terms of action, that the masses under- 
stand and need, have no place in Communism as expounded 
in this work. Those who academically adhere to the principle 
of "no compromise" whatever, wiH no doubt take issue with 
Lenin in the positioa that he lays down in this work. This is, 
of course, permissible. No one, but a fool, would contend 
that merely because Lenin says something that it is correct. 



'i 



10 

However, the fact that he holds a certain position adds weight 
j to it, and this question can well be approached by the reader 

/ with an open and considerate mind. As outlined in this 

\ volume, the question runs so counter to everything that most 

Marxists have maintained in this country in the past, that 
there is no doubt there will be many a heated debate before 
t4ie thing is definitely settled in the movement here. American 
Marxists have been forced by this fight against the worst kind 
of opportunism to preach a general tactic of "no compromise" 
and it will be with considerable reluctance that they give up 
that position. However, if we accept as realists what we have 
always maintained in the past — that "Marxism is not a dogma 
_^ but a guide to action" we cannot refuse to consider carefully 

Lenin's position upon this question, and if finding it correct 
seek the best posible application of it to American conditions. 
We cannot expect to lay down rules and regulations that will 
guide the American movement for all time. That would be a 
Utopian absurdity. "To invent' such a formula or general 
rule as 'NO COMPROMISES,' which would serve in all 
cases, is an absurdity." The argument will be raised ihat 
once we start compromising there will be no end to the ])i ac- 
tice and ppportunism will secure a foothold and again Lecome 
the order of the day. That since one compromise is bad, all 
compromises are bad. Lenin says : "In practical questions of 
the policy appropriate to each separate or specific historic 
moment it is important to be able to distinguish those in which 
arc manifested the main species of inadmissible treacherous 
compromises, which embody opportunism detrimental io the 
revolutionary class, and to direct all possible efforts towards 
elucidating and fighting them." The whole "history of Bol- 
shevism, both before and after the October Revolution, is full 
of instances of manoeuvring, temporizing and compromising 
with others, the bourgeois parties included!" This will noi 
set well upon the stomachs of some of our '^no compromise" 
comrades who see the necessity of always and at all times 
keeping our tactics clear of so-called "political manoeuvring." 
However, "To carry on a war for the overthrow of the inter- 
national bourgeoisie, a war a hundred times more difficult, 
prolonged and complicated than the most stubborn of ordinary 
wars between countries, and to refuse beforehand to manoeu- 



^i^^^_^^b 



> 11 

vre, to utilize the conflict (even though temporary) of inter- 
ests between one's enemies; to refuse co-operation and com- 
promise with possible (even though transient, unstable, vacil- 
lating, and conditional) allies — ^is not this an infinitely laugh- 
able thing? Is it not as though in the difficult ascent of an 
unexplored and heretofore inaccessible mountain, we were to 
renounce beforehand the idea that we might have to go some- 
times in zig-zags, sometimes retracing our steps, sometimes 
giving up the course once selected and trying various others ?" 
One certainly is justified in using every strategy in fighting 
the class war both against the capitalist class itself and its 
henchmen within our ranks. We will find it increasingly 
necessary to manoeuvre and "stall" as the class-struggle grows 
more acute. This tactic is justified by necessity. "To bind 
one's hands beforehand, openly to tell the enemy, who is now 
better armed than we are, whether or not we shall fight him, 
is stupidity and not revolutionism. To accept battle when 
this is obviously profitable to the enemy, and not to oneself, 
is a crime ; and those politicians of the revolutionary class who 
are unable to 'manoeuvre, temporize, compromise,' in order to 
evade an obviously unprofitable battle, are good for nothing." 

One must not lose sight of the fact that the position that 
Lenin lays down is for a movement that is well organized, 
disciplined and understands what it wants. A too literal 
application of these tactics to America may cause us a lot 
of trouble in the future, and we must study the conditions' 
carefully. A well organized and disciplined organization is 
lacking in America and it will be some time before one is built 
up that will function. In 4:he meantime a generous discussion 
of this work should help the organization of such a move- 
ment and speed the day of the Dictatorship of the Proletariat 
in America. 

D. E. B. 





c 



* * 



■4 



' '^ iJ « L ■ ■ ■ «i I I Hi ii 



"LEFT WING" COMMUNISM: 

AN INFANTILE DISORDER 



By NIKOLAI LENIN 



CHAPTER I. 

IN WHAT SENSE CAN WE SPEAK OF THE INTER- 
NATIONAL SIGNIFICANCE OF THE RUSSIAN 

REVOLUTION ? 






During the first months after the Russian proletariat had 
conquered political power (October 25 [November 7], 1917,) 
it might have seemed that the proletarian revolution in other 
countries would be very little like ours, because of the tre- 
mendous differences between backward Russia and the ad- 
vanced countries of Western Europe. But we have now con- 
siderable iexperience, of an international scope, which pretty 
definitely establishes the fact that some fundamental features 
of our revolution are not local, not peculiarly national, not 
Russian only, but that they are of international significance. 
And I say "international significance," not in the broad sense 
of the word ; not some features, but all fundamental and many 
secondary features are, in the sense of their influence upon 
other countries, of international significance. Not in the strict- 
est sense of the word — ^that is, taking it in its essence — or in 
the sense of the historical inevitability of a repetition, on an 
international scale, of what we in Russia have gone through ; 
but one must admit some fundamental features of our revolu- 
tion to be of such international significance. Of course, it 
would be the greatest mistake to exaggerate this truth and to 




IT 



w 

apply it to more than the fundamental features of our revdu- 
tion. It would be likewise erroneous to keep in mind that, 
after the proletarian revolution in at least one of the advanced 
countries, things will in all probability take a sharp turn ; Russia 
will cease to be the model, and will become again the back- 
ward (in the "Soviet" and Socialist sense) country. 

But at this historical moment such is the state of affairs that 
the Russian example reveals something quite essential to all 
countries in their near and inevitable future. The advanced 
workers in every land have long understood it — ^although in 
many cases they did not so much understand it as feel it, 
through the instinct of their revolutionary class. Hence the 
intematibnal "significance" (in the strict sense of the word) 
of the Soviet power, as well as of the fundamentals of Bol- 
shevik theory and tactics. This the "revolutionary" leaders of 
the Second International — ^Kautsky in Germany, Otto Bauer 
and Friedrich Adler in Austria — failed to understand and, 
therefore, turned into reactionaries and advocates of the worst 
kind of opportunism and social treason. The anon3rmous 
pamphlet. The World Revolution, which appeared in 1919 in 
Vienna, shows plainly their whole process of thought or, what 
is more correct, all their appalling imbecility, pedantry, das- 
tardliness and betrayal of working-class interests under the 
guise of "defending" the idea of "world revolution." Of this 
pamphlet we shall speak at greater length on some other oc- 
casion. Here we shall remark only this : that in the time, now 
long gone by, when Kautsky was yet a follower of Marx and 
not the renegade he is today, approaching the question as Bn 
historian, he foresaw the possibility of the revolutionary spirit 
of the Russian proletariat serving as an example for Western 
Europe. This was in 1902, when Kautsky wrote an article 
headed "The Slavs and the Revolution," published in the revo- 
lutionary organ, Iskra. This is what he wrote : — 

"At the present time (in contradistinction to the year 1848) 
it may be assumed that not only havct the Slavs entered the 
ranks of the revolutionary peoples, but that the center of grav- 
ity of revolutionary thought and revolutionary action is moving 
farther and farther to the Slavs. The revolutionary center is 
moving from the West to the East. In the first half of the 



_^jk _„.-.~M-^ — — ^— — — — — ^ - rr T- _ Jft_J.J^a 



15 

nineteenth century this center was in France, and sometimes 
in England. In 1848 Germany entered the ranks of revolu- 
tionary nations. The new century is being ushered in by such 
events as induce us to think that we are confronted by a fur- 
ther removal of the revolutionary center, namely, to Russia. 
Russia, which has imbibed so much revolutionary initiative 
from the West, is now perhaps itself ready to serve as a source 
of revolutionary energy. The Russian revolutionary move- 
ment, which is now bursting into flame, will, perhaps, become 
the strongest means for the extermination of the senile philis- 
tinism and sedate politics which is beginning to spread in our 
ranks, and will again rekindle the militant spirit and the pas- 
sionate devotion to our great ideals. Russia has long ceased 
to be for Western Europe a simple prop for reaction and ob- 
solutism. The case now may be said to be reversed. It is 
Western Europe that is now becoming the mainstay of reac- 
tion and absolutism in Russia. As far as the Czar is con- 
cerned, the Russian revolutionists would perhaps have coped 
with him long ago, had they not been compelled to fight simul- 
taneously his ally, European capital. Let us hope that they 
will find themselves able this time to settle both enemies, and 
that the new 'Holy Alliance' will crash to the ground sooner 
than its predecessor. But however the present struggle in 
Russia may end, the blood of the martyrs who have sprung 
from it, unfortunately in too great numbers, will not have been 
shed in vain. It will nourish the shoots of the social revolu- 
tion throughout the civilized world, and make them flourish 
more quickly. In 1848 the Slavs were that crackling frost 
which killed the flowers of spring of the awakening peoples; 
perhaps now they are destined to be that storm which will 
break through the ice of reaction and will irresistably bring 
with it the new, happy spring of the peoples." (Karl Kautsky : 
"The Slavs and the Revolution," article in Iskra, the Russian 
Social-Democratic revolutionary paper, 1902, No. 18, March 
10). 

How well did Kautsky write eighteen years ago ! 



7^ 



CHAPTER II. 

ONE OF THE PRINCIPAL CONDITIONS OF THE 
SUCCESS OF THE BOLSHEVIKS. 

Probably almost everyone can see now that the Bolsheviks 
could not have maintained themselves in power for two and 
a half years, nor even for two and a half months, without the 
most stringent, I may say iron, discipline in our party, and 
without the fullest and unreserved support rendered it by the 
working class, that is, by that part of it which is sensible, hon- 
est, devoted, influential, capable of leading and of inspiringihe, 
backward masses with enthusiasm. 

,The dictatorship of the proletariat is the fiercest and most 
merciless war of the new class against its more ix)werful 
enemy, the bourgeoisie, whose power of resistance increases 
tenfold after its overthrow, even though overthrown in only 
one country. The power of the bourgeoisie rests not alone 
upon international capital, upon its strong international con- 
nections, but also upon the force of habit, on the force of small 
industry pf which, unfortunately, there is plenty left, and 
which daily, hourly, gives birth to capitalism and bourgeoisie, 
spontaneously and oh a large scale. Because of all this, the 
dictatorship of the proletariat is indispensable. Victory over 
the bourgeoisie is impossible without a long, persistent, des- 
perate, life and death struggle : a struggle which requires /per- 
sistence, discipline, firmness, inflexibility and concerted will- 
power. 

I repeat, the experience of the triumphant dictatorship of 
the proletariat in Russia has furnished an object-lesson to 
those who are incapable of reasoning or who have had no o]v 
]iortunity to reason on this question. It proves that unquali- 
fied centralization and the strictest discipline of the proletariat 






V 






17 

• 

are among the principal conditions for the victory over the 
bourgeoisie. Here people usually stop. They do not inquire 
sufficiently into the meaning of .the dictatorship of the prole- 
tariat, and under what condition^ it is possible. Would it not 
be better to accompany the greetings to the Soviet power and 
the Bolsheviks by a more searching analysis of the reasons 
why the latter were able to institute a discipline necessary for 
the revolutionary proletariat? 

Bolshevism, as a current of political thought and as a politi- 
cal party, dates back to the year 1903. Only the history of its 
whole period of existence can explain satisfactorily why it was 
able to institute and maintain, under most difficult conditions, 
the iron discipline necessary for the proletarian victory. 

And, first of all, the question arises — Upon what rests the 
discipline of the revolutionary party of the proletariat ? How 
is it controlled? How is it strengthened? First, by the class- 
consciousness of the proletarian vanguard and by its devotion 
to the Revolution, by its steadiness, spirit of self-sacrifice, and 
heroism. Secondly, by its ability to mix with the toiling^ 
masses, to become intimate and, to a certain extent if you will, 
fuse itself with the non-proletarian toilers. Thirdly, by the 
soundness of the political leadership, carried out by this van- 
guard, and by its correct political strategy and tactics, based 
on the idea that the workers from their own experience must 
convince themselves of the soundness of this political leader- 
ship, strategy and tactics. Without all these conditions discip- 
line in a revolutionary party, really capable of being a party 
o.f the foremost class whose object is to overthrow the bour- 
geoisie and transform society, is impossible of realization. 
Without these conditions all attempts to create discipline result 
in empty phrases, in mere contortions. On the other hand, 
these conditions wi]J not arise suddenly. They are created 
through long. effort and bitter experience. Their creation is 
facilitated by correct revolutionary theory, which in its turn 
is not dogmatic, but which forms itself in its finality only 
through close connection with the practice of the real mass and 
truly revolutionary movement. 

If Bolshevism could successfully, and under the greatest 



y 



es, achieve in 1917-1920 the strictest centralization and 

cipline, it was due simply to a series of historical 
ities of Russia. 

,e one hand, Bolshevism came into being in 1903 on. the 
u foundation of Marxian theory. And the soundness 
revolutionary theory, and of no other, was proved not 
the experience of all countries during the entire 19th 

but particularly by the experience of the ramblings, 
ons, mistakes and disappointments of revolutionary 

in Russia. For half a century — approximately be- 
le forties and nineties of the preceding century — ad- 
intellects in Russia, under the yoke of the wildest and 
actionary Czarism, sought eagerly for a correct revo- 
y theory, following each and every "last word" in 
and America with astounding diligence and thorough- 
Russia has attained Marxism, the only revolutionary 
by dint of fifty years' travail and sacrifice, through the 

revolutionary heroism, the most incredible energy and 
1 in seeking, educating, practical experience, disap- 
nt, checking and comparison with European experience. 

to the emigration forced by the Czar, revolutionary 
in the second half of the 19th century, came into pos- 
of rich international connections, and of a grasp of the 
ive forms and theories of the revolutionary movement 
such as no other country had. 

le other hand, having come into existence on this gran- 
Tetical foundation, Bolshevism went through fifteen 
1903-1917) of practical history which, in fertility of 
ice, had no equal anywhere else in the world. In no 
mntry, during, those fifteen years, was there anything 
mating to such wide revolutionary experience, such a 
and rapidity of shifting forms in the movement — legal 
jal, peaceful and stormy, open and underground, em- 
small circles and large masses, parliamentary and ter- 
In no other country, during so short a period of time, 
re been concentrated such a multiplicity of forms, 
md methods of struggle, embracing all classes of mod- 
ety. To this it must be added that the struggle matur- 



1 



I* 



\ 



ing with particular rapidity, because of the badkwardncss of 
the country and the heavy yoke of Czarism, assimilated eagerly 
and successfully the latest developments of American and 
European political experience. 



7 



/ 



CHAPTER III. 

THE CHIEF STAGES IN THE HISTORY OF 

BOLSHEVISM. 

The Years of Preparation for the Revolution (1902-1905). 

The approach of the great storm is felt everywhere. There 
is a fermentation and preparation in all classes. Abroad, the 
emigrant press carries on a theoretical discussion of all ques- 
tions pertaining to the Revolution. The representatives of the 
three main political currents, of the three principal classes — 
Hberal-bourgeois, petit-bourgeois democratic (concealed under 
the guise of "Social Democrats" and "Socialist Revohition- 
aries") and proletarian-revolutionary — anticipate and prepare 
the approaching class-struggle in the open by their bitter an^ 
obdurate fight on questions of program and tacticsi'^'All the 
problems which the masses were solving in 1905-1906 and 
1917-1920 by force of arms, can and should be traced in their 
embryonic form in the press of that time. Between these three 
main currents of thought, there are, of course, plenty of inter- 
mediary, transient, dwarfed forms. In other words, in the 
fight of press, parties, factions, groups, the political doctrines 
of the classes definitely crystalize themselves ; there the classes 
forge the proper ideo-political weapons for the coming battles. 

The Years of Revolution (1905-1907). 

All classes come out into the open. All ques- 
tions of program and tactics are tested by the 
action of the masses. A strike movement, unknown 
anywhere else in the world for its extent and acuteness, breaks 
out. The economic strike gives way to the political strike, 
which, in its turn, grows into a rising. The relations between 
the proletariat in the van and the vacillating, unstable peasantry 



.* 



MiM 




in Ac rear, are tested practically. In the spontaneous develop- 
ment of the struggle, the Soviet form of organization is bom. 
The disputes, in these days, on the significance of Soviets, an- 
ticipate the great struggle of 1917-1920. The interchange of 
parliamentary and non-parliamentary forms in the struggle, of 
the tactics of boycott and the tactics of participation in parlia- 
ment, of legal and illegal methods, "and likewise their inter- 
relation and connection — all this is distinguished by wonderful 
richness of content. As far as the acquisition by masses and 
leaders, by cla3ses and parties, of the fundamentals of political 
science is concerned, one month of this period was equivalent 
to a whole year of "peaceful," "constitutional" development. 
Without a general rehearsal in 1905, the victory of the October 
revolution of 1917 would have been impossible. 

The Years of Reaction (1907-1910). 

Czarism triumphant. ^AU revolutionary and op- 
position parties are shattered. , Depression, demorali- 
zation, schism, dispersal, renegacy, pornography in- 
stead of politics. A strenthening of the drift to 
philosophic idealism ; mysticism, as the outer garb of counter- 
revolutionary tendencies. At the same time, it is the great 
defeat which gives the revolutionary parties and the revolu- 
tionary class a real and useful lesson, a lesson in historical 
dialectics, a lesson in intelligent understanding, ability and 
skill in carrying on the political struggle. Friends are better 
known in misfortune. Defeated armies learn their lesson well. 

^Triumphant Czarism is compelled, nevertheless, to push for- 
ward the disintegration of what remains of the pfe-bourgeois, 
patriarchal state of Russia. She moves along the path of bour- 
geois development with remarkable rapidity. Illusions, orig- 
inating outside of and above all classes, that it was possible for 
Russia to avoid capitalism, are crushingly shattered. The 
class-struggle assumes altogether new and more intense forms. 

The revolutionary parties must continue their training. Here- 
tofore they learned to attack. Now they understand that they 
must add to their knowledge of attack a knowledge of how 
best to retreat. It becomes necessary to understand — ^and the 



22 

revolutionary class by its own bitter experience learns to un- 
derstand — that victory is impossible without a knowledge both 
of how to attack and of how to retreat correctly. Of all the 
shattered opposition and revolutionary parties, the Bolsheviks 
effected the most orderly retreat, with the least damage to 
their "army." They, more than any other, preserved the 
nucleus of their party, suffered the fewest splits — ^in the sense 
of deep, irremediable splits — felt the least demoralization, and 
were in the best position to renew work on a large scale effi- 
ciently and energetically. The Bolsheviks only attained this 
by mercilessly exposing and throwing out the revolutionists of 
phrases, who did not wish to understand that it was necessary 
to retreat, that it was obligatory upon them to learn how to 
work legally in the most reactionary parliaments, in the most 
reactionary trade-unions, co-operatives, workmen's insurance 
and similar organizations. 

The Years of Revival (1910-1914). 

At first the revival was exceedingly slow; after 
the events in the Lena mines in 1912, somewhat 
more rapid. Overcoming immense difficulties, the^Bol-' 
sheviks drove back the Mensheviks, whose role as bour- 
geois agents in the working-class movement was perfectly 
understood by the whole bourgeoisie after 1905, and who, 
therefore, were supported by that class against the Bolsheviks. 
But the latter would never have succeeded as they did if they 
had not pursued the right tactics of co-ordinating illegal forms 
of work with obligatory utilization of all "legal possibilities." 
In the most reactionary Duma the Bolsheviks won the whole 
labor vote. 

The First Imperialist World-War (1914-1917). 

Legal parliamentarism, in the conditions of an extremely re- 
actionary "parliament," render3 most useful service to the revo- 
lutionary party, to the Bolsheviks. Bolshevik deputies go to 
penal servitude. In the emigrant press, all shades, all distinctions 
of social-imperialism, social-chauvinism, social-patriotism, con- 
sistent and inconsistent internationalism, pacifism and the 
revolutionary negation of pacifist illusions, find full expression. 




23 

The learned fools and old women of the Second International 
who arrogantly and contemptuously turned up their noses at 
the many "factions" in Russian Socialism and the stubborn- 
ness with which they fought one another, were unable, when 
the war deprived them of their blessed "legality" in all the ad- 
vanced countries, to organize anything even approximating such 
free (illegal) interchange of views and such free (illegal) 
hammering-out of the right views, as did the Russian revolu- 
tionists in Switzerland and other countries. Just because of 
this inability of theirs, both the downright social-patriots and 
the "Kautskians" of all countries have proved the worst kind 
of traitors to the proletariat. And if the Bolsheviks were able 
to attain victory in 1917-1920, one of the principal causes of 
this victory was that Bolshevism already, in 1914, had merci- 
lessly unmasked all the abomination, turpitude and criminality . 
of social-chauvinism and "Kautskianism" (to which Longuet- 
ism in France, the views of the leaders of the Independent 
Labor Party and the Fabians in England, and of Turati in 
Italy, correspond), while the masses, from their own experi- 
ence, were becoming more and more convinced of the sound- 
ness of the views of the Bolsheviks. 

The Second Revolution in Russia (from February to 

October, 1917). 

Czarism, now hoary with age, had created, under the 
heavy blows of this tormenting war, a tremendous destructive 
power which was now directed against it. In a few days, 
Russia was turned into a democratic, Bourgeois republic, more 
free, considering the state of war, than any other country in 
the world. The Government was beginning to be formed by 
the leaders^of the Opposition and Revolutionary parties, just 
after the manner of the most ^'strictly parliamentary" repub- 
lics. The fact that a man had been a leader of the opposition, 
though in the most reactionary parliament imaginable, aided 
him in his subsequent career in the Revolution. 

The Mensheviks and the "Socialist Revolutionaries" mas- 
tered, in a few weeks, all the tricks and manners, arguments 
and sophistries of the European heroes of the Second Inter- 
national, of the ministerialists and other opportunist worthies. 



r 



r 



24 

What we now read of Scheidemann and Noske, Kautsky and 
Crispien, Renner and Austerlitz, Otto Bauer and Fritz Adler, 
Turati and Longuet, of the Fabians and the leaders of the Inde- 
pendent Labor Party in England — all this seems to us, and, in 
reality, is, a dreary repetition, a paraphrase of an old, familiar 
song. The Mensheviks have long ago sung it to us. History 
has played a joke on us and made the opportunists of a back- 
ward country anticipate the opportunists of a great many ad- 
vanced countries. 

That all the heroes of the Second International suffered 
bankruptcy and disgraced themselves on the question of the 
role and significance of the Soviets and Soviet power ; that the 
leaders of three very important parties which have now left 
the Second International (namely, the German Independent 
Social Democratic Party, the French Longuetists and the 
British Independent Labor Party) have especially "vividly" 
disgraced themselves on this question; that they have all 
proved slaves to the prejudices of petit-bourgeois democracy 
(quite in the spirit of the petit-bourgeois of 1848 who called 
themselves "social democrats") — all this conveys to us noth- 
ing new. We have already seen all of it in the example of the 
Mensheviks. History has played off this joke: in Russia, in 
1905, Soviets were born : in February-October, 1917, they were 
tampered with by the Mensheviks, who went bankrupt because 
of their inability to understand the role and significance of the 
Soviets, and, now that the idea of Soviets has come to life the 
world over, spreading itself with tremendous rapidity among 
the proletariat of all countries, the old heroes of the Second 
International are also everywhere going bankrupt, because, 
like our Mensheviks, they are unable to understand the true 
role and significance of Soviets. Experience has shown that, 
on some very essential points in the proletarian revolution, all 
countries will inevitably have to repeat Russia's experience. 

The successful struggle against what was in reality the par- 
liamentary bourgeois republic, and against the Mensheviks, 
was begun by the Bolsheviks very cautiously, and, contrary to 
the view often met with in Europe and America, it was not at 
all without careful preparation. At the outset of the period 



\ 



25 

indicated, we did not call for the overthrow of the government, 
but explained the impossibility of overthrowing it without a 
preliminary change in the personnel and disposition of the 
Soviets. We did not proclaim a boycott of the bourgeois par- 
liament, of the Constitutent Assembly, but said — after the 
April, 1917, conference of our party officially, in the name of 
the organization — ^that a bourgeois republic with a Constituent 
Assembly is better than one without, but that a "workmen's 
and peasants' " Soviet republic is better than any bourgeois 
democratic, parliamentary, republic. Without such a careful, 
substantial, cautious and prolonged preparation, we could not 
have obtained victory in October, 1917, neither could we have 
maintained it. 



•s 



CHAPTER IV. 

WHO WERE THE ENEMIES IN THE WORKING-CLASS 

MOVEMENT IN THE STRUGGLE AGAINST WHOM 

BOLSHEVISM GREW, GAINED STRENGTH 

AND BECAME HARDENED? 

First of all, and principally, in the struggle against oppor- 
tunism, which, in 1914, grew definitely into social chauvinism, 
and finally deserted to the bourgeoisie against the proletariat. 
This was nztturally the chief enemy of Bolshevism within the 
movement of the working * class, and this remains the chief 
enemy also on an international scale. This enemy claimed, and 
claims, most of the attention of the Bolsheviks, whose work 
in this sphere is already well known abroad. 

Something else, however, must be said of the other enemy 
of Bolshevism in the working-class movement. It is not suffi- 
ciently known abroad that Bolshevism grew up, formed^ and 
hardened itself in long years of struggle against petit-bour- 
geois revolutionism, which resembles, or borrows something 
from, anarchism. It differs in one respect or another, in all 
essentials, from the conditions and requirements of a con- 
sistent proletarian class-struggle. For Marxians it is well- 
established theoretically — and the experience of all European 
revolutions and revolutionary movements fully confirms — ^that 
the small owner (the social type which in many European 
countries is very numerous and widespread), who, under cap- 
italism, is constantly oppressed and suffering, and whose con- 
ditions of life often take a sharp and rapid turn for the worse, 
moves easily when faced with ruin to extreme revolutionism, 
but is incapable of displaying consistency, organization, 
discipline and firmness. The petit-bourgeois, "gone mad" 
from the horrors of capitalism, is a social phenomenon which, 



>Mh^-'> ■ "" ■ 



like anarchism, is characteristic- of all capitalist countries. 
The weakness of such revolutionism, its futility, its liability 
swiftly to transform itself into obedience, apathy, phantasy 
and even into a "mad*' infatuation with some bourgeois 
"fashionable" tendency — all this is a matter of common 
knowledge. But a mere recognition in the abstract, a theo- 
retical recognition of these truths, does not* at all free revo- 
lutionary parties from old mistakes, which always appear 
unexpectedly in a somewhat new form, in new trappings^ in 
more or less original surroundings. 

Anarchism was often a kind of punishment for the oppor- 
tunist sins of the working-class movement. Anarchism and 
opportunism were two deformities, one complementary to the 
other. It is partly due to Bolshevism that, notwithstanding the 
fact that the population of Russia, in comparison with Euro- 
pean countries, is largely of a petit-bourgeois make-up, an- 
archism exercised a comparatively insignificant influence dur- 
ing the revolutions of 1905-1917; for Bolshevism has always 
carried on a merciless and uncompromising fight against 
opportunism. I say, it is partly due to Bolshevism, for *a still 
greater part in weakening the influence of anarchism in Russia 
was played by the fact that it had the opportunity to flourish in 
full bloom in the seventies of the nineteenth century, and to 
reveal completely its uselessness as a guiding theory of the 
revolutionary class. 

Bolshevism, at its inception in 1903, was imbued with the 
tradition of merciless struggle with petit-bourgeois, semi- 
anarchist and dilettante-anarchist revolutionism. This tradi- 
tion afways obtained in the revolutionary social democracy, and 
gained special strength in Russia in 1900-1903, when the foun- 
dations were being laid for a mass party of the revolutionary 
proletariat. Bolshevism continued the fight with the party 
which, more than any other, expressed tendencies of a petit- 
bourgeois revolutionism, namely, with the "Socialist-Revolu- 
tionaries." This fight was conducted on three main points. 
First, this party, rejecting Marxism, stubbornly refused to 
understand (it would be more correct to say that it could not 
understand) the necessity of a strictly objective estimate of all 
the dass forces and their inter-rdation in every political 




2« 

action. Secondly, in its individual terrorism and attempts at 
assassination, this party saw its peculiar claim to "revolution- 
ism" and "leftness" — a thing which we Marxians rejected. It 
is, of course, self-evident that we rejected individual terror 
only from considerations of expediency ; for those who would 
"on principle'* condemn the terror of the great French Revo- 
lution, or terror generally, on the part of a victorious revolu- 
tionary party, besieged by the bourgeoisie of the whole world, 
had been scorned and ridiculed by Plekhanoff in 1900-1903, 
when he. was a Marxist and revolutionary. Thirdly, the "So- 
cialist-Revolutionaries" thought it "leftness" to giggle at the 
comparatively insignificant sins of the German Social Demo- 
crats, while they themselves imitated the extreme opportunists 
of that party, as, for example, on the question of the dictator- 
ship of the proletariat or the agrarian question. 

History, by the way. has now on a large, universal scale, 
confirmed the opinion always advocated by us, that the revolu- 
tionary German Social Democracy (note the fact that Plek- 
hanoff, even in 1900-03, demanded the expulsion of Bernstein 
from the Party, and the Bolsheviks, always continuing this 
tradition, in 1913 exposed the .whole baseness, knavery and 
treachery of Legien) was the nearest approximation to that 
party which is necessary to the revolutionary proletariat to 
enable it to attain victory. Now, in 1920, after the ignomin- 
ious failures, bankruptcy and crises during the war and the 
first years after, it can be seen plainly that of all the Western 
parties it was the German revolutionary social democracy 
which gave the best leaders, restored itself, healed it wounds 
and gained new strength before all the others. This may be 
seen in the example of both the party of the Spartacists and 
the left, proletarian, wing of the "Independent Social-Demo- 
cratic Party of Germany," which carries on an incessant fight 
with the opportunism and characterlessness of the Kautskys, 
Hilferdings, Ledebours, and Crispiens. 

If we now take a general view of the historical period now 
comple^d — namely, from the Paris Commune to the first So- 
cialist Soviet Republic — we shall see in very clear perspective 
the whole attitude of Marxism towards anarchism. Marxism 
was right after aH, and, if the anarchists rightly pointed to the 



^mtatsmm 



29 

opportunism in the conception of the State, a conception pre- 
dominant in most of the Socialist Parties, it was not the fault 
of Marxism. First, this opportunism was due to misrepre- 
sentation and even downright concealment of Marx's views on 
the conception of the State. (In my book. The State and Revo- 
lution, I called attention to the fact that for thirty-six years, 
1875 to 1911, Bebel kept unpublished a letter by Engels which 
very vividly, pointedly, directly and clearly denounced the op- 
portunism of the popular social-democratic conception of the 
State.) Secondly, it was the truly Marxian tendencies in ihe 
Huropean and American Socialist Parties that were respon- 
sible for modifying these opporttmist conceptions by accepting 
Soviet power and recognizing its advantages over bourgeois 
parliamentary democracy. 

There were two instances in which Bolshevism carried on an 
especially arduous struggle against a "turn to the left" withni 
its own party; one was in 1908, on the question whether or 
not to participate in the most reactionary "parliament" and in 
the legal workers* societies, bound by the most reactionary 
laws and regulations; and again in 1918 (the Brest Treaty) 
on the question of whether any "compromise" is admissibk. 

In 1908 the "left" Bolsheviks were expelled from the Party 
for their stubborn refusal to understand the necessity of par- 
ticipating in the most reactionary "parliament." The "left," 
among whom there were some very excellent revolutionaries, 
who subsequently became, and continue to be, prominent mem- 
bers of the Communist Party, sought vindication in the policy 
of the boycott of the Duma in 1905, a particularly successful 
experience. When the Czar, in August, 1905, proclaimed the 
convocation of a consultative "parliament," the Bolsheviks 
came out with a declaration of boycott, in contradistinction to 
all the opposition parties and the Mensheviks. The October 
Revolution of 1905 actually swept away < that "parliament." 
At that time the boycott proved right, not because non-partici- 
pation in reactionary parliaments is right, but because when 
we studied the objective situation we saw that it led to the 
rapid transformation of mass strikes into political, then into 
revolutionary strikes, -and after that, into a rising. Besides, 
the struggle then was revolving around the question whether 



30 

to leave it in the hands of the Czar to convoke the first repre- 
sentative assembly or to attempt to take the convocation of the 
assembly out of the hands of the old government. In so far 
as there was not, and could not be, the certainty that we were 
faced with an objective situation developing in a similar direc- 
tion and as a similar pace the boycott ceased to be sound policy. 

The Bolshevik boycott of "parliament" in 1905 enriched the 
revolutionary proletariat with highly valuable political experi- 
ence, having shown that, by combining legal with illegal, par- 
liamentary with non-parliamentary, forms of struggle, it may 
become necessary, and even essential, sometimes to be able to 
reject parliamentary forms. But to transfer this experience 
blindly, imitatively, uncritically, into different surroundings and 
different conditions is the greatest possible mistake. A small 
error easily corrected* was the boycott of the Duma by the 
Bolsheviks in 1906. Very serious and not at all easy to cor- 
rect was the mistake of boycotting the Duma in 1907, 1908 
and after, when a rapid rising of the revolutionary wave, re- 
sulting in an armed insurrection, could not be expected, and 
when, on the other hand, all thie historical circumstances now 
strengthened by the bourgeois monarchy dictated the necessity 
of combining legal with illegal forms of work. Now, when we 
look back upon the complete historical period, whose connec- 
tion with the following periods has fully revealed itself, it be- 
comes particularly clear that the Bolsheviks would not have^ 
been able to preserve, certainly not to strengthen, develop and 
reinforce the stable nucleus of the revolutionary party of the 
proletariat in 1908-1914 if they had not succeeded in main- 
taining by a rigorous struggle, that it is obligatory to partici- 
pate in the most reactionary parliament and in many other 
organizations bound by the most reactionary laws (Workmen's 
Insurance Societies, etc.). 

In 1918 things did not go so far as to bring about a "split." 
The "left" Communists formed a separate group or "faction" 



• What is said of individuals may be said, with necessary modifica- 
tions, of politics and parties. The wise man is not he who makes no 
mistakes. There are not, and cannot be, suc{i men. He is wise who 
makes sliirKt mistakes and who is able to correct them easily and 
quickly. 



"""'-'■ '^ 



31 

within our party, but it was short-lived. The same year, the 
most prominent representatives of "left Communism," as, for 
example, Comrades Radek and Bukharin, openly admitted their 
mistake. It seemed to them that the Brest Treaty was, on prin- 
ciple, inadmissible, and a compromise with imperialists danger- 
ous to the party of the revolutionary proletariat. In truth it 
was a compromise with imperialists, but it was a compromise 
which, in the given surroundings, was imperative. 

Today, when I hear criticism, for instance by the Socialist 
Revolutionaries, of our tactics in signing the Brest Treaty, or 
when I hear the remark of Comrade Lansbury, made by him 
in a cony.ersation with me: "Our English trade unionists say 
that they should be allowed compromises, since Bolshevism 
allowed ilself compromises,'* I usually reply first of all by way 
of a simple and "popular" comparison : 

Imagine that your automobile is held up by armed bandits. 
You hand them over your money, passport, revolver, the 
machine. In return you are spared the pleasant company of 
the bandits. The compromise is plainly there. "Do, ut des" 
(I "give" you money, arms, the automobile, in order that you 
"give" me the possibility of going in peace). But one can 
hardly find a sane man who would pronounce such a com- 
promise "inadmissible on principle," or would proclaim the 
compromiser an accomplice of the bandits— even though the 
bandits, having got into the automobile, used it and the fire- 
arms for new robberies, as was the case with me. Our com- 
promise with the bandits of German imperialism was such a 
compromise. 

But, when the Mensheviks and Socialist Revolutionaries in 
Russia, the Scheidemanns (and to a great extent the Kauts- 
kians) in Germany, Otto Bauer and Friedrich Adler (let alone 
the Messrs. Renner and Co.) in Austria, the Renaudels, Long- 
uets and Co. in France, the "Independents" and the 
"Laboritfes" and the Fabians in England, effected in 1914-1918, 
and in 1918-1920, compromises with the bandits of their own 
bourgeoisie, and sometimes with those of the bourgeoisie of 
the "Allies," against the revolutionary proletariat of their 
country, that is where these worthies were guilty of aiding and 
abetting. 



w 



¥ 



32 

The conclusion is clear: To reject compromises on "prin- 
ciple," to reject every admissibility of compromises generally, 
no matter of what kind, is a piece of childishness hard even to 
take seriously. He who wishes to be useful to the revolution- 
ary proletariat must be able to sift the concrete cases of such 
compromises which are inadmissible, which stand for oppor- 
tunism and treachery, and to direct all the force of his criti- 
cism against these concrete compromises, mercilessly exposing 
them, fighting them to a finish, and not allowing "experienced 
Socialists" and parliamentary Jesuits to dodge and shirk 
responsibilities by resorting to discussions of "compromises 
generally." The "leaders" of the British trade unions, as well 
as of the Fabian Society and the "Independent" Labor Party, 
use just this method of dodging responsibility for the betrayal 
they committed. Theirs was a compromise which indicated 
the worst kind of opportunism, treason and betrayal. 

There are compromises and compromises. It is necessary 
to be able to analyze the situation and the concrete facts of 
each compromise or of each species of coinpromise. It is 
necessary to learn to distinguish the man who gave the bandits 
money and arms in order to lessen the evil caused by this 
gentry and to facilitate the business of capturing and shooting 
them, from the man who gives to bandits money and arms in 
order to share the booty. In politics it is not always so easy 
to make distinctions as in this childishly simple little example. 
But whoever took it into* his head that he could contrive for 
the workers a formula which would give beforehand ready 
solutions of all cases, or who would assert that in the political 
experience of the revolutionary proletariat there will be no 
difficulties, no intricate problems to solve, would be merely a 
charlatan. To leave no room for misunderstandings, I shall 
attempt to outline very briefly a few fundamental rules for 
the analysis of concrete compromises. 

The party which compromised with German imperialism by 
signing the Brest Treaty had been evolving internationalism 
in deed since the end of 1914. It did not fear to proclaim the 
defeat of the Czarist monarchy and to repudiate the "defence 
of the Fatherland" in a war between two imperialist plun- 
derers. The members of this party in the Duma preferred 



33 

the road to penal servitude in Siberia rather than the road 
leading to ministerial portfolios in bourgeois governments. 
The revolution, which overthrew Czarism and established the 
democratic republic, subjected the party to a new and tre- 
mendous test; the party rejected all temporizing with "its 
own" imperialists, but prepared their overthrow and did over- 
throw them. Having taken over the political power, not the 
smallest fragment was left, either of the property of the land- 
lords or of the capitalists. After publishing and repudiating 
the secret treaties of the imperialists, this party proposed peace 
to all the peoples, and yielded to the Brest plunderers only 
after the Anglo-French imperialists had caused our peace pro- 
posals to miscarry, and after the Bolsheviks had done every- 
thing humanly possible to hasten the revolution in Germany 
and other countries. That such a compromise made by such 
a party in such a situation was absolutely correct, becomes 
clearer and more self-evident to everyone from day to day. 

The Mensheviks and the Socialist-Revolutionaries in Russia 
(like the leaders of the Second International in 1914-20 the 
world over) began their betrayal by justifying the "defence 
of the Fatherland," that is, the defence of their^ marauding 
bourgeoisie. They continued their betrayal by entering into 
a coalition with the bourgeoisie against the revolutionary 
proletariat of their country. Their bloc, first with Kerensky 
and the Cadets (Constitutional Democrats), then with Kolt- 
chak and Denikin in Russia, like the bloc of their confreres 
abroad with the bourgeoisie of their respective countries, was 
the bridge which led them to alliances with the bourgeoisie 
against the proletariat. Their compromise with the bandits 
of imperialism consisted from beginning to end in their willing 
participation in imperialist robbery. 



•/ 



CHAPTER V. 

''LEFT' COMMUNISM IN GERMANY: LEADERS- 
PARTY-CLASSES THE MASSES. 

The German Communists, of whom we shall now speak, call 
themselves not "left," but, if I am not mistaken, the "opposi- 
tion on principle/' That they fully come under the symptoms 
of the "infantile disorder of leftness" will be seen from what 
follows. 

A small pamphlet headed, "The Split in the Communist 
Party of Germany" (the Spartacist Union) issued by "the 
local groups in Frankfurt-am-Main," sets forth pointedly, 
concisely, clearly and briefly the substance of the views of the 
opposition. A few quotations will suffice to acquaint the 
reader with the essential points: 

"The Communist Party is a party of the most decisive class 
struggle. ..." 

"Politically, this transition period (between capitalism and 
Socialism) is the period of the proletariat dictatorship. . . ." 

"The question arises: Who should be the wielder of this 
dictatorship; the Commtinist Party or the proletarian 
class ?" 

"Ow principle, should we strive towards the dictatorship of 
the Communist Party or the dictatorship of the proletariat ? ! !" 
(Italics in the original). 

Further, the E. C. of the Communist Party of Germany is 
accused by the author of the pamphlet of seeking a way to a 
coalitibn with the Independent Socialist Party of Germany; 
that "the question of accepting, as a matter of principle all 
political means of struggle" including parliamentarism, has* 
been put to the forefront by E. C. only for the purpose of 




concealing its main and real intention, coalition with the Inde- 
pendents. And the pamphlet goes on: 

"The Opposition has selected a different road. It is of the 
opinion that the question of the supremacy of the Communist 
Party and of its dictatorship is only a question of tactics. At any 
rate, the supremacy of the Cummunist Party is the last form 
of any party supremacy. On principle, we must strive towards 
the dictatorship of the proletariat, and all the party measures, 
its organization, methods of struggle, its strategy and tactics 
must be planned to fit accordingly. Therefore, every, compro- 
mise with other parties must be rejected. There mist be no 
turning back to the already outworn historical sffld. ^Htical 
forms of the parliamentary struggle, no policy of manoeuver- 
ing and temporizing." "The specifically proletarian methods 
of the revolutionary struggle must be strongly emphasized. 
In order to embrace the greatest mass of the proletariat which 
is to carry on the revolutionary fight under the leadership of 
the Communist Party, there must be created new forms of 
organization upon the broadest foundations and within the 
widest limits. The gathering place for all revolutionary ele- 
ments is the Workers' Union, formed on the basis of the shop 
committee. Here all the workers who followed the slogan of 
"Leave the trade unions" must gather and unite; here the 
militant proletariat draws itself up in the thickest ranks. The 
acceptance of the class struggle, the Soviet system and the 
dictatorship, is sufficient for admittance. All further political 
training of the struggling masses, and the political orientation 
of the struggle, is the task of the Communist Party, standing 
outside the Workers' Union. . . ." 

"Two Communist Parties are consequently arrayed, one 
against the other. One party of the leaders, a party which 
strives to organize the revolutionary struggle and direct it 
from above, resorting to compromises and parliamentarism in 
order to create a situation which would enable it to enter a 
coalition government, in whose hands should rest the dictator- 
ship. The other, a mass party which relies upon the impetus 
of the revolutionary struggle from below, conscious of and 
applying but one method in the fight, that method leading 
clearly to the goal ; rejecting all parliamentary and opportunist 



' i 




procedure. Unconditional overthrow of the bourgeoisie, in 
order to establish the proletarian class dictatorship for the 
realization of Socialism, that is the only possible method. . . .** 

"There the dictatorship of the leaders, here the dictatorship 
of the mass — such is our slogan.'* 

These are the essential points characterizing the views of 
the Opposition in the German Communist Party. 

Any Bolshevik who has consciously participated in, or 
watched closely, the developments of his party since 1903 will 
at once say, after reading these arguments, "What old and 
well-known rubbish ! What 'left' childishness !" 

But let us look at these arguments a little rnore closely. The 
very question, "Dictatorship of the party or dictatorship of the. 
class, dictatorship of the leaders or dictatorship of the masses'' 
bears witness to an amazing and hopeless confusion of mind.' 
People bend every effort to elaborate something extraordinary, 
and in their zeal to be intellectual they become ridiculous. It 
is common knowledge that the masses are divided into classes ; 
that to contrast masses with classes is possible only when we 
contrast the largest general majority, undivided in respect of 
its position in the social scale with categories occupying a 
definite position in the social scale ; that the classes are usually 
and in most cases led by political parties, at least in modern 
civilized countries; that political parties, as a general rule, 
are led by more or less stable groups of the more influential, 
authoritative, experienced members, elected to the most re- 
sponsible positions, and called leaders. All this is elementary. 
It is simple and plain. Why then all this rigmarole, this new 
Volapuk ? 

On the one hand, men who were confronted with great dif- 
ficulties, when the rapid alternation between legal to illegal 
existence interrupted the usual normal, simple relations be- 
tween leaders, parties and classes, apparently lost their head. 
In Germany, as in other European countries, people had be- 
come much used to over legality, to the free and normal elec- 
tion .of their "leaders" at the regular party conventions, to 
convenient methods of testing the class composition of the 



37 

party through parliamentary elections, meetings, the Press and 
the temper of the members of the trade and other unions, etc. 
When, in face of the stormy advance of the revolution and the 
spread of civil war, it became necessary to shift quickly from 
legal to illegal positions, to co-ordinate them, to resort to 
"inconvenient" and "undemocratic" methods of picking out or 
constituting or preserving "groups of leaders," people lost 
their heads and began inventing all sorts of supernatural non- 
^is.e. Probably some members of the Dutch Communist 
into traditions and conditions of particularly privileged and 
Party who had the misfortune to be born in a small country, 
stable legality, who have not known at all what it means to 
shift from a legal to an illegal position, got themselves en- 
tangled and contributed to this muddle. 

On the other hand, one notices the superficial and incoherent 
use of the now "fashionable" terms "masses" and "leaders." 
People have heard much and have conned by rote all the friv- 
olous attacks on "leaders" — contrasting them with the 
"masses" — ^but failed to grasp the application and the inner 
meaning of these words. 

The parting of the ways of "leaders" and "masses" showed 
itself with peculiar clarity and sharpness in all countries at 
the end of and after the imperialist war. The principal cause 
of this phenomenon was many times explained by Marx and 
Engels in 1852-92 by the example of England. The dominant 
position of England created in the "masses". a labor aristoc- 
racy, petit bourgeois and opportunist. The leaders of this 
labor aristocracy constantly deserted to the bourgeoisie, and 
were directly or indirectly in its pay. Marx, to his honor, 
roused the hatred of these wretches by openly branding them 
as traitors. The newest (20th century) imperialism has 
created a monopolist, privileged position for a few advanced 
countries, and this brought to the surface everywhere in the 
Second International a certain type of leader-traitors, oppor- 
tunists, social-chauvinists, who look after the interests of their 
particular group in the labor aristocracy. This caused the op- 
portunist parties to break away from the "masses," that is, 
from the greatest mass of the toilers, from the majority of the 
working-class, from the lowest paid workers. The victory of 




J8 

the working-class is impossible unless this evil is fought, un- 
less the opportunist, social-traitor leaders are exposed, dis- 
graced and expelled. The Third International pursues this 
policy. 

To twist the subject so as to draw comparisons between dic- 
tatorship of the mass generally and dictatorship of the leaders 
is a laughable absurdity and piece of foolishness. It is espe- 
cially comical that, instead of old leaders who have a common- 
sense viewpoint on ordinary matters, new leaders are put forth 
(concealed under the slogan of "down with leaders") who 
prattle supernatural nonsense and spread confusion. Such are 
Laufenberg, Wolfheim, Homer, Karl Schroeder, Friedrich 
Wendell, and Karl Erler in Germany.* 

The attempt by the latter to make the question "more pro- 
found," and to proclaim that political parties altogether are 
unnecessary and "bourgeois," reaches such a Herculean pitch 
of absurdity that one is perplexed how to describe it in speech. 
Verily it may be said, that a small mistake persisted in, learn- 
edly demonstrated, and "carried to its logical conclusion," will 
grow into a monstrosity. 

The negation of party and party discipline — that is the result 
of the arguments of the Opposition. And this is equivalent to 
disarming the proletariat in favor of the bourgeoisie. It is 
akin to that petit-bourgeois looseness, instability, incapacity 
for steady, unified, and harmonious action, which, if given en- 
couragement, must bring to nought every proletarian revolu- 



• See the Commun. Arb. Zeitung", Hamburg", January 7, 1920, No. 32: 
"Auflosungr der Partei" (The Dissolution of the Party), by Karl 
Brier: "The working-'Class cannot destroy the bourg-eois state with- 
out destroying the bourgeois democracy, and it cannot destroy bour- 
geois democracy without the abolition of the party." ("Die Arbeiter 
Klasse kann den btirgerlichen Staat nicht zertriimmern ohne Ver- 
nichtung der burgerlich6n Demokratie,. und sie kann die burgerliche 
Demokratie nicht vernichten ohne die Zertrummerung der Parteien.") 

The more muddle-headed among the syndicalists and anarchists of 
the Latin countries may en j oy a p ertajp self satisfaction: serious Ger- 
mans, who evidently consToer themselves Marxfsts (K. Erler and K. 
Horner in their articles in the above-mentioned papers particularly 
solidly maintain that they are solid Marxists, all the more ludicrously 
revealing their ignorance of the A B C of Marxism by talking incred- 
ible nonsense) talk themselves into a point of view altogether inap- 
propriate. Acceptance of Marxism does not save one from naistakes. 
and the Russians especially know this well, because, in our country, 
Mur^^sm wa» particularly frequently "i^ ^aplilop," 




tionary movement. To reject party, from the view-point of 
Communism, means to leap f f om the eve of the capitalist over- 
throw (in Germany), not to the initial or middle stages of 
Communism, but to its highest phase. We in Russia, in the 
third year after the overthrow of the bourgeoisie, are going 
through the first steps in the transition from capitalism to 
Socialism, that is to say, the lowest stage of Communism. 
Classes remain, and will remain for years, everywhere after 
the proletarian conquest of power. Perhaps in England, where 
there is no peasantry, the period will be shorter, but even there 
small owners, holders of property exist. To abolish classes 
means not only to get rid of landlords and capitalists — ^that 
we have accomplished with comparative ease — it means also 
to get rid of the small commodity producers, and they cannot 
be eliminated or suppressed. There must be an understanding 
with them, they can and should be regenerated, re-trained ; but 
this requires a long, gradual, careful organization. They sur- 
round the proletariat on every side with a petit-bourgeois at- 
mosphere, impregnating the proletariat with it, corrupting and 
demoralizing the proletariat, causing it to relapse into petit- 
bourgeois lack: of character, disintegration, individualism, and 
alternation between moods of exaltation and dejection. To 
oppose this, it is necessary to have the strictest centralization 
and discipline within> the political party of the proletariat. It 
is necessary, in order to carry on the organising activities of 
the proletariat (and this is its principal role) correctly, suc- 
cessfully, victoriously. The dictatorship of the proletariat is 
a resolute persistent struggle, sanguinary and bloodless, violent 
and peaceful, military and economic, educational and admin- 
istrative, agaiftst the forces and traditions of the old society. 
The force of habit of the millions and tens of millions is a 
formidable force.^ Without an iron party hardened in fight, 
without a party possessing the confidence of all that is honest in 
the given class, without a party capable of observing the dis- 
position of the masses and of influencing it successfully to con- 
duct such a struggle is impossible. To defeat the great, cen- 
tralized bourgeoisie is a thousand times easier than to "defeat" 
millions and millions of small owners who in their daily, im- 
perceptible, inconspicuous but demoralizing activities achieve 
the very results desired by the bourgeoisie, and restore the 



40 

bourgeoisie. Whoever in the least weakens the iron discipline 
of the party of the proletariat (especially during its dictator- 
ship), aids in reality the bourgeoisie against the proletariat. 

Beside the question of leaders, of party, of class, and of the 
masses, it is necessary to raise the question of the "reaction- 
ary" Trade Unions. But first I shall take the liberty of making 
a few concluding remarks based upon the experience of our 
party. There, we always heard attacks upon the "dictatorship 
of the leaders." I remember having heard such attacks for 
the first time in 1895 when formally there was as yet no party, 
but only a central group, which began to form itself in Peters- 
burg, and which was to assume the leadership over the district 
groups. At the ninth conference of our party (April, 1920), 
there was a small opposition, which also spoke against the 
"dictatorship of the leaders," of "oligarchy," etc. There is, 
therefore, notliing wonderful, nothing new, nothing terrible in 
the "infantile disorder" of "Left Communism," in Germany. 
It is an affliction which passes by without injury to the or- 
ganism, which, in fact, even strengthens it afterwards. On 
the other hand, the rapid shifting from legal to illegal work 
which made it especially necessary to "hide" the movements 
of the general staff, that is to say, the leaders, sometimes gave 
rise to dangerous situations. The worst case was in 1912, 
when an agent-provocateur, Malinovsky, got into the Central 
Committee of the Bolsheviks. He betrayed scores of the best 
and most devoted comrades, causing their imprisonment and 
hastening their death. That he did not cause more mischief 
was due to the efficient co-ordination between the legal and 
illegal forms of our activities. Malinovsky, as a member of 
the Central Committee of the Party and a deputy in the Duma, 
was forced, in order to gain our confidence, to aid us in es- 
tablishing daily papers, which even under the Czar Knew how 
to carry on the fight openly against the opportunism of the 
Mensheviks, and to preach the fundamentals of Bolshevism in 
properly disguised forms. With one hand, Malinovsky sent to 
jail and to death scores upon scores of the most active Bol- 
sheviks, while with the other he was compelled to aid in the 
training of scores and scores of thousands of new adherents 
through the medium of the legal Press. It will not harm those 




41 

of dvLT German comrades (as well as the English, French, 
Italian and American), who are confronted with the problem 
of how to carry on revolutionary work inside the reactionary 
trade unions, to consider this fact seriously.* 

In many countries, and particularly in the most advanced, 
the bourgeoisie is undoubtedly sending, and will continue to 
send, agents-provocateurs into the Communist Party. One 
method of struggle against this peril is a skilful co-ordination 
of legal and illegal work. 



* Malinovsky was a prisoner of war in Germany. When he re- 
turned to Soviet Russia, he was instantly arrested, tried and shot by 
our working men. The Mensheviks attacked us acrimoniously for 
our mistakes in making" an agent-provocateur a member of the 
Central Committee of our party. But when, under Kerensky, we de- 
manded the arrest of Rodzianko, the Speaker of the Duma, in order 
to try him for his having known, even before the war, that Malinov- 
sky was an agent-provocateur, and for his failure to inform the 
Labor group in the Duma and the workers of this fact, the Men- 
sheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries who were in Kerensky's cab- 
inet did not support our demand, Rodzianko remained at large, and 
then went off freely to Denlkin. 




CHAPTER VI. 

SHOULD REVOLUTIONARIES WORK IN REACTION. 

ARY TRADE UNIONS? 

The German "Left" consider the reply to this question to be 
decidedly in the negative so far as they are concerned. Ac- 
cording to their opinion, mere declamations and angry ejacula- 
tions (as done by K. Horner in a particularly "solid" and 
stupid manner) against "reactionary" and "counter-revolu- 
tionary" Trade Unions are sufficient to prove that it is not only 
useless but also not permissible for revolutionaries and Com- 
munists to work in the yellow, social-chauvinist, temporizing 
and conservative organization of the type of the Legien 
Unions. But, however strongly the German "Left" may be 
convinced of the revolutionary nature of such tactics, these are 
in reality fundamentally wrong, and contain nothing but empty 
phrases. 

In order to explain this, I shall begin with our own experi- 
ence, in so far as it coincides with the general scheme of the 
present article, the aim of which is to apply to Western Europe 
everything that is of general significance in the history and the 
present tactics of Bolshevism. 

The relation between leaders, party, class, masses, and at 
the same time the relation of the proletarian dictatorship and 
its Party to the Trade Unions, present themselves to us in the 
following concrete form. The dictatorship of the proletariat 
is carried out by the proletariat organized jh Soviets, which 
is led by the Communist Party (Bolsheviks), which, according 
to the data of the last party Conference, in April, 1920, has 
611,000 members. The number of members varied greatly 
both before and after the October Revolution, and was con- 
siderably less even in 1918 and 1919. We are afraid of too 



' f r^'\ \ 



43 

• 

wide a growth of the Party, as place-seekens and adventurers, 
who deserve only to be shot, do their utmost to get into the 
ruling Party. The last time we opened wide the doors of the 
Party for workmen and peasants only was in the days (winter, 
1919) when Yudenitch was a few versts f ro*m Petrograd, and 
Denikin was in Orel (about 3?0 versts from Moscow) ; that 
is, when the Soviet Republic was in mortal danger, and when 
the adventurers, place-seekers, charlatans and unreliable per- 
sons generally could in no way rely upon. making a profitable 
career (in fact coui3 sooner expect the gallows and torture) 
by joining the Communists. The Party, which convenes annual 
Conferences (the last on the basis of one delegate for each 
1,000 members), is directed by a Central Committee of 19, 
elected at the Conference ; while the current work in Moscow 
has to be done by still smaller boards, viz., the so-called "Org- 
bureau" (Organizing Bureau) and "Politbureau" (PoHtical 
Bureau) , which are elected at the plenary sessions of the Cen- 
tral Committee, five members of the C.C. for each Bureau. 
This, then, looks like a real "oligarchy." Not a single impor- 
tant political or organizing question is decided by any State 
institution in our Republic without the guiding instructions of 
the C. C. of the Party. 

In carrying on its work, the Party rests directly on the Trade 
Unions, which, at present, according to the data of the last 
Conference (April, 1920), comprise over 4,000,000 members, 
who are formally non-party. In reality, all the controlling 
bodies of by far the greater number of unions, and primarily, 
of course, of the All-Russian Center or Bureau (A.R.C.C.T.U. 
All-Russian Central Council of Trade Unions) consist of Com- 
munists, who carry out all the directions of the Party. Thus 
is obtained, on the whole, a formally non-Communist, flexible, 
comparatively extensive and very powerful proletarian appa- 
ratus, by means* of which the Party is closely connected with 
the class and the masses, and by means of which, under the 
guidance of the Party, class dictatorship is realized. Without 
the closest connection with the Trade Unions, without their 
hearty support and self-sacrificing work, not only in economic 
but also in military organization, it would have been, of course, 
impossible to govern the country and to maintain the die- 



r 



44 

tatorship for two and a half years, or even for two and a half 
months. It is clear that, in practice, this closest connection 
means very complicated and varied work in the form of propa- 
ganda, agitation, conferences — ^held often and at the right 
time, not only with the leading but also with the generally in- 
fluential Trade Union workers; it also means a determined 
struggle against the 'Mensheviks, who still have a certain, 
though quite a small, number of adherents, whom they teach 
various counter-revolutionary tricks, such as lending moral 
support to the cause of (bourgeois) democracy, preaching the 
"independence" of Trade Unions (independence of the prole- 
tarian State!) and even sabotage of proletarian discipline, 
etc., etc. 

The connection with the "masses" through Trade Unions we 
admit to be insufficient. Practice in the course of the revolu- 
tion has given rise to non-party workers* and peasants' Con- 
ferences, and we endeavor by every means to support, develope, 
and extend such institutions in order to maintain a close con- 
tact with the disposition and state of mind of the masses, to 
respond to their inquiries, to push forward the best of their 
workers to take positions in State institutions, etc., etc. In 
one of the last decrees concerning the transformation of the 
People's Commissariat for State Control into the "Workmen's 
and Peasants' Inspection," non-party Conferences of this kind 
are given the right to elect members to the State Control for 
various sorts of State inspections. 

Then, of course, all the work of the Party is done through 
the Soviets, which unite the laboring masses irrespective of the 
difference of their trade or profession. The County (Uye^d) 
Congresses of Soviets are a democratic institution such as has 
never yet been seen in the most advanced bourgeois republics. 
Through these Congresses, whose proceedings are followed by 
the Party with very careful attention, as well as through the 
constant delegation of class-conscious workmen to occupy 
various positions in the countryside, the city fulfils its function 
of leading the peasantry. Thus is carried out the* dictatorship of 
the proletariat, and the systematic struggle against the rich, 
exploiting, and speculating peasantry. 



'45 

Such IS the general mechanism of the proletarian State con- 
sidered from "above," from the point of view of practice in 
realization of the dictatorship. It is hoped that the reader will 
understand why, to a Russian Bolshevik well acquainted with 
this mechanism and having watched its growth out of small 
underground circles during twenty-five years, all talk of "from 
above" or "from below," the "dictatorship of leaders" or "the 
dictatorship of the masses" cannot but appear as childish non- 
sense. It is something like discussing whether the left leg or 
the right arm is more useful to man. 

Not less laughable and childishly nonsensical appears to us 
the important, learned and horribly revolutionary disquisitions 
of the German "Left" as to why Communists cannot and 
should not work in reactionary Trade Unions; why it is per- 
missible to refuse such work ; why it is necessary to leave the 
craft unions and to create in their stead quite new and quite 
pure "workmen's unions" invented by exceedingly nice (and, 
for the most part, probably very youthful) Communists, etc., 
etc. 

Capitalism inevitably leaves, as an inheritance to Socialism. 
on the one hand, old professional and craft differences created 
among the workers in the course of centuries ; and on the other, 
Trade Unions, which only, very slowly and in the course of 
years, can and will develope into broader industrial rather than 
craft organization (embracing whole industries and not merely 
crafts, trades and professions). These industrial unions will, 
in their turn, lead to the abolition of division of labor between 
people, to the education, training and preparation of workers 
who will be able to do everything. Communism is moving in 
this direction; it must move and will arrive at that goal but 
only after a great many years. To attempt in practice today, 
to precipitate development of this characteristic of a thor- 
oughly developed, stable and completely matured Communism 
would be like trying to teach a four-year-old child higher 
mathematics. 

We can and must begin to build up Socialism, not with the 
fantastic htunan material created by our imagination, but out 
of the material left to us by capitalism. This, no doubt, is 



very •*difificult," but every other way of tackling the problem is 
not serious enough to even discuss. 

Trade Unions marked a gigantic step forward of the work- 
ing class at the beginning of capitalist development, as a tran- 
sition from the disintegration and helplessness of the workers 
to the beginnings of class organizations. When the proletarian 
revolutionary party (which does not deserve the name until it 
learns to connect leaders-class-masses into one single indis- 
soluble whole), when this last, highest, form of proletarian 
class-organization began to grow up, the Trade Unions un- 
avoidably revealed some reactionary traits, a certain craft 
limitation, a certain tendency to non-political action, a certain 
conservatism, etc., etc. But the development of the prole- 
tariat did not and could not, anywhere in the world, proceed 
by any other road than that of Trade Unions, with their mutual 
activity with the working-class party. The seizing of political 
power by the proletariat, as a class, is a gigantic step forward ; 
and it is incumbent upon the party to educate the Trade Unions 
in a new manner, distinct from the old one, to guide them, not 
forgetting meanwhile that they remain and will remain for a 
long time a necessary "school of Communism," a preparatory 
school for the training of the proletariat to realize its dic- 
tatorship, an indispensable union of the workers for the per- 
manent transference of the management of the country's 
economic life into their hands as a class (and not to single 
trades), to be given later into the hands of all the laboring 
masses. 

A certain conservatism of the Trade Unions, in the sense 
mentioned, is unavoidable under the dictatorship of the pro- 
letariat. Not to understand this means completely to fail to 
understand the fundamental conditions of the transition from 
capitalism to Socialism. To fear this reactionary tendency, to 
try to avoid it, to jump over it, is as foolish as it can possibly 
be ; it indicates lack of confidence in the role of the proletarian 
vanguard to train, educate and enlighten, to infuse with new 
life, the most backward groups and masses of the working 
class and the peasantry. On the other hand, to postpone the 
realization of the proletarian dictatorship until such a time as 
there is not left a single professionally narrow-minded work- 



47 

man, until all are quite free from craft and Trade Union 
prejudices, would be a still greater mistake. For a Communist, 
with a correct understanding of his own ends, the art of pol- 
itics lies in correctly calculating the conditions and the moment 
when the proletarian vanguard can take over power success- 
fully. He must decide when, after this assumption of power, 
that vanguan-d will be able to obtain adequate support from 
sufficiently inclusive strata of the working-class and non- 
proletarian laboring masses, and when it will be able to main- 
tain, consolidate and extend its supremacy, educating, training 
and attracting ever widening circles of the laboring masses. 

In countries more advanced than Russia, a certain reaction- 
ary spirit has revealed, and was unquestionably bound to reveal 
itself in the Trade Unions much more strongly than in our 
country. Our Mensheviks had (and in a very few Trade 
Unions still have) the support of these organizations, just 
because of their craft narrow-mindedness, professional selfish- 
ness, and opportunism. In the west the Mensheviks have 
acquired a much firmer footing in the Trade Unions. There 
a much wider stratum of labor aristocracy — those professional, 
narrow-minded, selfish, brutal, jealous, petit bourgeois ele- 
ments — has cropped up, imperialistically inclined, and bribed 
and corrupted by imperialists. That this is so needs no proof. 
The struggle against Gompers, Jouhaux, Henderson, Merr- 
heim, Legien and Co. in Western Europe is much more difficult 
than the fight with our Mensheviks, who represent a thor- 
oughly homogeneous social and political type. This struggle 
must be mercilessly conducted until, as was done in our case, 
all the incorrigible leaders of opportunism and social- 
chauvinism have been completely exposed and thrown out of 
the unions. It is impossible to conquer political power, and 
the conquest should not even be attempted until this struggle 
has reached a certain stage. This certain stage must vary in 
•different countries and different circumstances. Only clear- 
minded, experienced and well-informed political leaders are 
able to estimate it correctly. In Russia, incidentally, the 
measure of success in the struggle was gauged by the elections 
to the Constitutent Assembly in November, 1917, a few days 
after the proletarian revolution of October 25, 1917. In these 



AS 

elections the Mensheviks were totally defeated, having ob- 
tained 0.7 million votes (1.4 millions if the vote of Trans- 
Caucasia be added) as against 9 million votes obtained by the 
Bolsheviks.* 

We carry on the struggle against the labor aristocracy in the 
name of the working masses, in order to gain them over to our 
side; and we do battle against the opportunist *and social- 
chauvinist leaders in order to achieve the sam*e object. To 
forget this most elementary and self-evident truth would be 
stupid. But the German "Left'' Communists commit just this 
stupidity when, because of the reactionary and coimter-revohi- 
tionary heads of the Trade Unions, they jump, by some inex- 
plicable mental process, to the conclusion that it is necessary 
to abandon these organizations altogether! They refuse to 
work in them! They invent new invented working-men's 
unions ! This is an unpardonable blunder, and one by which 
the Communists render the greatest service to the bourgeoisie. 
Our Mensheviks, like all opportunist, social-chauvinist Kauts- 
kian leaders of Trade Unions, are nothing more nor less than 
the "agents of the bourgeoisie in the labor movement'* (as we 
always express it) , or "labor lieutenants of the capitalist class," 
according to the excellent and highly expressive summary of 
the followers of Daniel De Leon in America. Not to work 
within the reactionary Trade Unions means to leave the in- 
sufficiently-developed or backward working masses to the 
influence of reactionary leaders, agents of the bourgeoisie, 
labor aristocrats — "bourgeoisified workers." (See Engels' 
letter to Marx in 1852, concerning British workers.) 

It is just this absurd "theory" of non-participation by Com- 
munists in reactionary Trade Unions that demonstrates most 
clearly how light-mindedly these "Left" Communists regard 
the question of influence over the "masses," how they con- 
tradict their own outcries about the "masses." In order to be 
able to help the "masses" and to win their sympathy, confidence 
and support, it is necessary to brave all difficulties, attacks, 



* See my article: "Elections to the Constituent Assembly and the 
Proletarian Dictatorship," in No. 7 — 8 of the Communist Interna- 
tional. 



49 

insults, cavik and persecutions by the leaders (who, being 
opportunists and social-chauvinists, are, in most cases, directly 
or indirectly connected with the bourgeoisie and the police), 
and to work by every possible means wherever the masses are 
to be found. Great sacrifices must be made, the greatest hin- 
drances must be overcome, in order to carry on agitation and 
propaganda systematically, stubbornly, insistently, and patient- 
ly, in all those mstitutions, societies, and associations, how- 
ever reactionary, where proletarians or semi-proletarians 
gather, together. As for Trade Unions and Co-operatives (this 
applies, at least sometimes, to the latter), they are just the 
oVganizations where the mass is to be found. In Great Britain, 
according to data given in the Swedish paper, Folkets Dagblad 
Politiken, of March 10, 1919, the Trade Union membership 
from the end of 1917 to the end of 1918 rose from 5.5 millions 
to 6.6 millions — i, e,, an increase of 19 per cent. Towards the 
end of 1919, this number reached 7.5 millions. I have not at 
hand the corresponding data about France and Germany, but 
the facts testifying to the rapid growth in membership of the 
Trade Unions in these countries are quite incontestable and are 
generally known. 

4 

These facts speak most clearly, and are confirmed by thou- 
sands of other indications, of the growth of claes-consciousness, 
and of the passion for organization, which exists especially 
amongst the proletarian masses, in the "rank and file," amongst 
the backward elements. Millions of workers in England, 
France and Germany who were not at all organized heretofore 
have, for the first time, entered the most elementary, most 
simple and most easily accessible form of organization — for 
those still imbued with bourgeois-democratic prejudices — 
namely, the Trade Unions. And the revolutionary but unwise 
"Left" Communists stand by, crying "The mass, the mass!" 
and refuse to work with the Trade Unions ; refuse on the 
pretext of their "conservatism," and contrive new, spick and 
span "Workers^ Unions," guiltless of bourgeois-democratic 
prejudices, guiltless of craft feeling and narrow professional- 
Ism! These Workers' Unions, they claim, will be (will be!) 
all-embracing, and for participation in them the only (only!) 
requirement is "the acceptance of the Soviet system and the 



so . 

dictatorship ot the proletariat." (See the previous quotation !) 

A greater lack of sense and more harm to the revolution 
than this attitude of the "Left" revolutionaries cannot be im- 
agined. Why, if we in Russia, after two and a half years of 
incredible victories over the Russian bourgeoisie and the En- 
tente, had demanded that entrance into the Trade Unions must 
be conditional upon the "acceptance of the dictatorship," we 
should have committed a stupid act, impaired our influence 
over the masses, s^d helped the Mensheviks. For the whole 
of the Communist problem is to be able to convince the back- 
ward, to work in their midst, and not to set up a barrier be- 
tween us and them, a barrier of artificial childishly "Left** 
slogans. 

There can be no doubt that Messrs. Gompers, Jouhaux, Hen- 
derson, L^en, ^tc, are very grateful to such "Left" revolu- 
tionaries who, like the German "Opposition-in-principle" Party 
(Heaven preserve us from such "principles") or like revolu- 
tionaries in the American "Industrial Workers of the World," 
preach the necessity of quitting reactionary Trade Unions and 
oi refusing to work in them. Undoubtedly the leaders of 
opportunism will have recourse to all the tricks of bourgeois 
dipl(»nacy, will appeal to the help of bourgeois governments, 
to priests, police, courts, in order to prevent Communism from 
entering the Trade Unions, by all and every means to put them 
out, to make their work inside these organizations as un- 
pleasant as possible, to insult, hound and persecute them. In 
is necessary to be able to withstand all this, to go the whole 
length of any sacrifice, if need be, to resort to strategy and 
adroitness, illegal proceedings, reticence and subterfuge, to 
anything in order to penetrate into the Trade Unions, remain 
in them, and carry on Communist work inside them, at any 
cost. Under Czarism until 1905 we had no "legal possibilities," 
but when Zubatov, the secret service agent, organized Black 
Hundred workers' meetings and workmen's societies for the 
purpose of f orreting out revolutionaries and fighting them, we 
sent members of our party into these meetings and societies. 
(I personally remember one such comrade, Babushkine, an 
eminent Petrograd workman, who was shot by the Czar's 
generals in 1906.) They put us in touch with the^ masses, ac- 



_i 



51 

quired much skill in conducting propaganda, and succeeded in 
wresting the workers from under the influence of Zubatov's 
agents.* Of course, in Western Europe, which i^ soaked 
through and through with inveterate legalist, constitutionalist, 
bourgeois-democratic prejudices, it is more difficult to carry 
on such work; but it can and should be carried on, and car- 
ried on systematically. 

The Executive Committee oi^he Third International should, 
in my opinion, directly/condem^the policy of non-participation 
in reactionary Trade Unions; and they! should suggest' to the 
next conference of the Communist International the necessity 
of<fssuingf a general condemnation of such policy, stating in 
detaipttie reasons for the irrationality of non-participattofi and 
excessive harm it brings to the cause of the proletarian 
revolution. They should specify in particular the line of con- 
duct of some Dutch Cdifimunists who, whether directly or 
indirectly, openly or covertly, wholly or partially, supported 
this erroneous policy. The Third International must break 
with the tactics of the Second, and not evade or belittle sore 
points, but face them squarely. The whole truth has been put 
squarely to the German Independent Social-Democratic Party ; 
the whole truth must likewise be told to the "Left" Com- 
munists. 



* The Gompers, Hendersons, Jouhaux and Legriens are nothing: else 
than Zubatovs. differing from ours only In their European dreas, in 
the gloBS of their civilized, refined, democratically smooth manner of 
conducting their scoundrelly policy. 



CHAPTER VIT. 

SHOULD WE PARTICIPATE IN BOURGEOIS 

PARUAMENTS? 

The German Left Communists with the greatest contempt — 
and the greatest lightmindedness — reply to this (question in the 
negative. Their arguments. In the quotation cited above wc 
saw: — "to refuse most decisively any return to the historically 
and politically worn-out forms of struggle of parliamentarism." 

This is said with absurd pretentiousness, and is obviously 
incorrect. "Return" to parliamentarism ! Does that mean that 
the Soviet Republic already exists in Germany? It does not 
look as though such were the case. How is it possible, then, 
to speak of "returning** ? Is not this an empty phrase ? . 

Historically, "Parliament has become worn-out"; this is 
correct as regards propaganda. But everyone knows that it is 
still very far from being threadbare when the practical ques- 
tion of eliminating Parliament is under consideration. Cap- 
italism could, and very rightly, have been described aa "his- 
torically worn-out" many decades ago, but this in no way 
removes the necessity of a very long and very hard struggle 
against capitalism at the present day. Parliamentarism is "his- 
torically worn-out" in a w^orld-historical sense ; that is to say, 
the epoch of bourgeois parliaments has come to ah end, the 
epoch of the proletarian dictatorship has begun. This is in- 
contestably true. But the scale of the world's history is reck- 
oned by decades. Ten or twenty years sooner or later — ^this 
from the point of view of the world-historical scale makes no 
difference, from the point of view of world-history it is a 
trifle, which cannot be even approximately reckoned. But this 
.isjiist why it is a crying theoretical mistake to refer, in ques- 
tions of practical politics, to the world-historical scale. 



-53 

Parliament is ''politically worn-out?" This is quite another 
matter. If this were true, the position of the "Left" would be 
strong. Whether it is actually true must be proved by the 
most searching analysis ; the "Left" do not even know how to 
tackle the problem. In the "theses on Parliamentarism," pub- • 
lished in No. 1 of the Bulletin of the Provisional Amsterdwni 
Bureau of the Communist International, February, 1920, which 
obviously expresses Dutch-Left (or Left-Dutch) views, we 
shall see that the analysis, too, is very poor. 

In the first place, the German "Left," as is known, consid- 
ered parliamentarism "politically worn-out" as far back as 
January, 1919, contrary to the opinion of such eminent political 
leaders as Rosa Luxemburg and Karl Liebknecht. It has now 
been seen that the "Left" made a mistake. This alone radically 
destroys the proposition that "parliamentarism is politically 
worn-out." It is incumbent upon the "Left" to prove that 
their mistake at that time has now ceased to be a mistake. 
They do not, and cannot, give even the shadow of a proof of 
their proposition. The attitude of a political party towards its 
own mistakes is one of the most important and surest criteria 
of the seriousness of the party, and of how it fulfils in prac- 
tice its obligations towards its class and towards the laboring 
masses. To admit a mistake openly, to disclose its reasons, to 
analyse the surroundings which created it, to study attentively 
the means of correcting it — ^these are the signs of a serious 
party; this means the performance of its duties; this means 
educating and training the class, and, subsequently, the masses. 
By n^lecting this, by faiUng to proceed with the utmost care, 
attention and prudence to investigate their self-evident mis- 
take, the "Left" in Germany (and some in Holland) proved 
themselves thereby to be not a class pa/rty, h\xt a circle, not a 
party of the masses, but a group of intellectuals, and a handful 
of workers who imitate the worst characteristics of the in- 
tdlecttials. 

Secondly, in the same pamphlet of the Frankfurt group of 
"Left Wingers," from which we have already cited in detail, 
we read : "Millions of workmen, still following the policy, of 
the center" (the Catholic "Center" Party) "are counter-revo- 



lutionaiy. The village proletarians produce l^ons of counter- 
revolutionary troops." (p. 3). 

Everything shows that this is said in much too off-hand and 
exaggerated a manner. But the fact here stated is funda- 
mentally correct, and its acknowledgement by the "Left" goes 
to prove their mistake with particular clearness. How is it 
possible to say that "parliamentarism is politically worn-out" 
when "millions" and "l^ons" of proletarians not only stand 
up for parliamentarism generally, but are directly counter- 
revolutionary ? It is clear, then, that parliamentarism in Ger- 
many is not worn-out politically as yet. It is evident that the 
"Left" in Germany have mistaken their desire, their ideo- 
political attitude, for objective reality. THis is the most dan- 
gerous error which can be made by revolutionaries. In Russia, 
where the fierce and savage yoke of Tsarism, extending over 
a long period, had created an extraordinarily great variety of 
revolutionaries of every creed, remarkable for their wonderful 
devotion, enthusiasm, strength of mind, and heroism, we 
watched this mistake particularly closely ; and it is because we 
studied it with particular attention that this mistake is espe- 
cially familiar to us, and especially apparent to our eyes when 
revolutionaries in other countries fall into it. For the Com- 
munists in Germany parliamentarism is, of course, "politically 
out-worn"; but — and this is the whole point — we must not 
deem that that which is outworn for us is necessarily outworn 
for the class, the masses. 'Here, again, we see that the "Left" 
do not know how to argue, do" ftbt know how to behave as a 
class, as a party of tlie masses.' _True, it is our duty not to sink 
to the level of the masses, to the level of the backward strata 
of the class. This is incontestable. It is our duty to tell them 
the bitter tfutli. It "is our duty "to cafl their bourgeois* demo- 
cratic and parliamentary prejudices by their right name. But, 
at the same time, it is our duty to watch soberly the actual 
state of consciousness and preparedness of the whole class, and 
not of the Communist vanguard alone ; of the whole laboring 
mass, and not merely of its foremost men. 

If, not "millions" and "legions," but merely a considerable 
minority of industrial workers follow the Catholic priests, and 
if a considerable minority of village workers follow the land- 



ss 

owners and rich peasants (grossbauem), it inevitably means 
that parliamentarism in Germany is not politically outworn as 
yet; hence participation in parliamentary elections and the 
struggle on the parliamentary platform is obligatory for the 
party of the revolutionary proletariat, just for the purpose of 
educating the backward masses of its own class, just in order 
to awaken and enlighten the undeveloped, down-trodden, ig- 
norant masses. Just so long as you are unable to disperse the 
bourgeois parliament and other reactionary institutions, you arc 
bound to work inside them, and for the very reason that there 
are still workmen within them made fools of by priests or by 
the remoteness of village life. Otherwise you run the risk of 
becoming mere babblers. 

Thirdly, the "Left" Communists have a great deal to say in 
praise of us Bolsheviks. One sometimes feels like telling 
them that it were better to praise us less, and go more thor- 
oughly into the tactics of the Bolsheviks, to get better ac- 
quainted with them. We participated in the elections to the 
Russian bourgeois parliament, the Constituent Assembly, in 
September-November, 1917. Were our tactics right or not? 
If not, this should be clearly stated and proved; this is essen- 
tial for the working out of the right tactics for international 
Communism. If, on the other hand, we were right, certain 
inferences should be drawn. Of course, there can be no ques- 
tion of approximating Russian conditions to the conditions of 
Western Europe. But where the special question of the 
phrase "parliamentarism has become politically outworn" is 
concerned, it is necessary by all means to gauge our experi- 
ence ; since, without a proper estimate of concrete experiences, 
such conceptions too easily resolve themselves into empty 
phrases. Had not we Russian Bolsheviks, in September and 
November, 1917, more right than any Western Communist to 
consider that parliamentarism in Russia had become politically 
outworn ? Undoubtedly we had, for the point is not whether 
bourgeois parliamentarism has existed for a long or a short 
period, but to what extent the laboring masses are prepared, 
spiritually, politically and practically to accept the Soviet 
r^ime and to disperse (or allow to be dispersed) the bour- 
geois democratic parliament. That in Russia, in Septemberr 






I 



*% 



56 

November, 1917, the working classes df the towns, the soldiers 
and the peasants, were, owing to a series of special circum- 
stances, exceptionally. well prepared for the acceptance of the 
Soviet regime and the dispersal of the democratic bourgeois 
parliament, is a quite incontestable and fully-established his- 
torical fact. However, the Bolsheviks did not boycott the 
Constituent Assembly, but took part in the elections before, as 
well as after, the conquest of political power by the proletariat. 
That these elections gave very valuable (and for the prole- 
tariat highly beneficial, political results — ^this I hope to have 
proved in the above-mentioned article, which deals in detail 
with the data concerning the elections to the Constituent 
Assembly in Russia. 

The inference which follows from this is quite clear ; it has 
been proved that participation in bourgeois-democratic parlia- 
ments a few weeks before the victory of the Soviet Republic, 
and even after that victory, not only has not harmed the revo- 
lutionary proletariat, but has actually made it easier to prove 
to the backward masses why such parliaments should be dis- 
persed, has made it easier to disperse them, and has facilitated 
the process whereby bourgeois parliaments are actually made 
"politically outworn." To pretend to belong to the Communist 
International, which must work out its tactics internationally 
(not on narrow national lines), and not to reckon with this 
experience, is to commit a great blunder, and, while acknowl- 
edging internationalism in words, to draw back from it in 
deeds. 

Let us have a look at the arguments of the "Dutch Left" in 
favor of non-participation in parliaments. Here is the most 
important of their theses, No. 4 : — 

When the capitalist system of production is broken down 
and society is in a state of revolution, parliamentary activity 
gradually loses its significance as compared with the action 
of the masses themselves. When then under such conditions 
Parliament becomes the center and organ of counter-revolu- 
tion, while on the other hand the working class creates the 
tools of its power in the shape of Soviets, it may even become 
necessary to decline all and any participation in parlia- 
mentary activity. 



57 

The first sentence is obviously wrong, sintc the action of the 
masses — a big strike for instance — ^is more important always 
than parliamentary activity,^ and not merely during a revolu- 
tion orjn a revolutionary situation.^ This obviously mean- 
ingless argument, historically *and polifically incorrect, only 
shows, with particular clearness, that the authors absolutely 
ignore both the general European experience (the French ex- 
perience before the revolutions of 1848 and 1870 ; the German 
from 1878 to 1890, etc.), and the Russian, cited above, with 
r^ard to the importance of unifying legal and illegal forms of 
the struggle. This question has immense significance gener- 
ally as weir as specially. In all civilized and advanced coun- 
tries, the time is coming speedily — it may, in fact, be said 
already to have come — when such unification becomes more 
and more — and, to an extent, has already become — obligatory 
for the party of the revolutionary proletariat. It is necessi- 
tated by the development and approach of the civil war be- 
tween the proletariat and the bourgeoisie, by the furious 
persecution of Communists by republican and all bourgeois 
governments generally, breaking the law in innumerable ways 
(the American example alone is invaluable). This most im- 
portant question has not been at all understood by these Dutch 
"Left Communists" or by the "Left" generally. 

The second phrase of the thesis is, in the first place, his- 
torically untrue. We bolsheviks took part in the most 
counter-revolutionary Parliaments. Experience showed that 
such participation was not only useful, but necessary to the 
party of the revolutionary proletariat, directly after the first 
bourgeois revolution in Russia (in 1905), to prepare the way 
for the second bourgeois revolution (February, 1917), and 
then for the Socialist revolution (November, 1917). In the 
second place, this phrase is strikingly illogical. If Parliament 
becomes an organ and a "center" (by the way it never has been 
in reality, and never can be, a "center") of counter-revolution, 
and the workmen create the tools of their power in the form 
of Soviets, it follows that the workers must prepare themselves 
— ^ideologically, politically, technically — for the struggle of the 
Soviets against parliament, for the dispersion of parliament by 
the Soviets. But it does not at all follow that such a dispersion 



c 



■s 

■.i 



58 

is made more difficult, or is not facilitated, by the presence of 
a Soviet opposition within the counter-revohitiOnary parlia- 
ment. In the course of our victorious fight against Etenikin 
and Koltchak, it never occurred to us that the existence in 
their rear of a Soviet, proletarian opposition, was immaterial 
to our victories. We know perfectly well that the dispersion 
of the Constituent Assembly on January 5, 1918, was not made 
more difficult, but was facilitated by the fact that, within the 
dispersed counter-revolutionary Constituent Assembly, there 
was a consistent Bolshevik, as well as an inconsistent Left- 
Social Revolutionary, Soviet opposition. The authors of the 
theses got into a muddle ; they forgot the experience of many, 
if not all, revolutions, which proved how particularly useful 
during a revolution is the co-ordination of mass action outside 
a reactionary parliament with an opposition inside the parlia- 
ment which sympathizes with — or better still, directly supports 
— revolution. 

These Dutchmen (and the "Left" in general) altogether 
argue here as doctrinaires of revolution, who never took part 
^ in a real one, or never deeply reflected on the history of the 
revolution, or naively mistake the subjective "denial" of a 
certain reactionary institution for its destruction in reality by 
the united forces of a whole series of objective factors. The 
surest way of discrediting a new political (and not only 
political) idea, and to cause it harm, is, under pretext of de- 
fending it, to reduce it to an absufdity. For every truth, as 
Dietzgen senior said, if it be "carried to excess," if it be ex- 
aggerated, if it be carried beyond the limits of actual applica- 
tion, can be reduced to an absurdity ; and, under the conditions 
mentioned, is even bound to fall into an absurdity. In their 
very zeal to help, the Dutch and German "Left" did unwitting 
harm to the new idea of the superiority of Soviet power over 
bourgeois-democratic parliaments. Of course, anyone who 
should say, in the old sweeping way, that refusal to particpate 
in bourgeois parliaments can under no circumstances be permis- 
sible, would be wrong. I cannot attempt here to formulate 
the ^conditions under which a boycott is useful, for the scope 
of my article is more limited ; here I only want to estimate all 
the possibilities of Russian experience in connection with cet- 



59 

tain burning questions of the day, questions of international 
Communist tactics. Russian experience has gfiven us one suc- 
cessful and correct application of the boycott (1905), and one 
incorrect application of it, by the Bolsheviks. In the first case 
we see that we succeeded in preventing the convocation of a 
reactionary parliament by a reactionary government, under 
conditions in which revolutionary mass action (strikes in par- 
ticular) outside i)arliament_was_growing with exceptional 
rapidity. At that time not a single element of the proletariat 
or the peasantry gave any support to the reactionary govern- 
ment; the proletariat secured for itself influence over the 
backward masses by means of strike and agrarian movements. 
It is quite evident that this experience is not applicable to 
present-day European conditions. It is also quite evident, on 
the strength of the foregoing arguments, that even a condi- 
tional defense of the refusal to participate in parliament, on 
the part of the Dutch and the "Left," is thoroughly wrong and 
harmftil to the cause of the revolutionary proletariat. 

In Western Europe and America, parliament has become an 
object of special aversion to the advanced revolutionaries of 
the working class. This is self-evident, and is quite compre- 
hensible, for it is difficult to imagine anything more abominable, 
base, and treacherous than the behavior of the overwhelming 
majority of Socialist and Social-Democratic deputies in Par- 
liament, during and after the period of the war. But it would 
be, not only unreasonable, but obviously criminal to yield to 
such a frame of mind when solving the question of how to 
struggle against this generally admitted evil. In many coun- 
tries of Western Europe the revolutionary mood is, we might 
say, a "novelty," a "rarity," which has been too long expected, 
vainly and impatiently it may be ; and it may be because of this 
that people more easily yield to their frame of mind. Of 
course, without a revolutionary disposition on the part of the 
masses, and without conditions tending to enhance this dis- 
position, revolutionary tactics will never materialize in action. 
But we in Russia have convinced ourselves, by long, painful, 
and bloody experience, of the truth that it is impossible to 
build up revoluticMiary tactics solely on revolutionary disposi- 
tion^ ami moo<j3, 



Tactics should be constructed on a sober and strictly 
objective consideration of the forces of a given country (and 
of the countries surrounding it, and of all countries, on a world 
scale), as well as on an evaluation of the experience of other 
revolutionary movements. To manifest one's revolutionism 
solely by dint of swearing at parliamentary opportunism, by 
rejecting participation in parliaments, is very easy: but, just 
because it is too easy, it is not the solution of a difficult, a most 
difficult, problem. In most European states, the creation of a 
really revolutionary parliamentary group is much more diffi- 
cult than it was in Russia. Of course. But this is only one 
aspect of the general truth that it was easy for Russia, in the 
concrete, historically quite unique, situation of 1917, to begin 
a social revolution ; whereas to continue it and complete it will 
be more difficult for Russia than for other European countries. 

Already at the beginning of 1918 I ha^ occasion to point out 
this circumstance, and since then an experience of two years 
entirely corroborates this point of view. Certain spedfifc con- 
ditions existed in Russia which do not at present exist in West- 
ern Europe, and a repetition of such conditions in another 
country is not very probable. These specific conditions were 

(1) the possibility of connecting the Soviet Revolution with 
the conclusion, thanks to it, of the imperialist war which had 
exhausted the workers and peasants to an incredible extait; 

(2) the possibility of making use, for a certain time, of the 
deadly struggle of two world-powerful groups of imperialist 
plunderers, who were unable to unite against their Soviet 
enemy; (3) the possibility of withstanding a comparatively 
lengthy civil war, partly because of the gigantic dimensions of 
the country and the bad means of communication ; (4) the ex- 
istence of such a profound bourgeois-revolutionary movement 
amongst the peasantry that the proletarian party included in 
fts program the revolutionary demands of the peasant party 
(the Socialist Revolutioiug-ies, a party sharply hostile to Bol- 
shevism), and at once realized these demands through the pro- 
letarian conquest of political power. 

The absence of these specific conditions — not to mention 
various minor ones — accounts for the greater difficulty whicli 
Western Europe must experience in banning the social revo- 



1 



6V 

lution. To attempt to "circumvent" this difficulty, by "jump- 
ing over" the hard task of utilizing reactionary parlian^nts 
for revolutionary purposes, is absolute childishness. You wish 
to create a new society ? And yet you fear the difficulties en- 
tailed in forming, in a reactionary Parliament, a sound group 
composed of convinced, devoted, heroic Communists! Is not 
this childishness? Karl Liebknecht in Germany and Z. Hog- 
lund in Sweden succeeded, even without the support of the 
masses from below, in giving examples of a truly revolution- 
ary utilization of reactionary parliaments. Why, then, should 
a rapidly-growing revolutionary mass party, under conditions 
of post-war disappointment ancf exasperation of the masses, 
be unable to hammer-out for itself a Communist faction in the 
worst of parliaments ? It is just because, in Western Europe, 
the backward masses of the workers and the smaller peasantry 
are much more strongly imbued with bourgeois-democratic 
and parliamentary prejudices than they are in Russia, that it 
is only in the midst of such institutions as bourgeois parlia- 
ments that Communists can and should carry on their long and 
stubborn struggle to expose, disperse, and overcome these 
prejudices, stopping at nothing. 

The German "Left" complain of bad "leaders" in their 
party and give way to despair, going to the length of a 
laughable "repudiation" of the said "leaders." But when 
conditions are such that it is often necessary to hide 
the "leaders" underground, the preparation of good, 
reliable, experienced and authoritative "leaders" is an 
especially hard task, and these difficulties cannot be success- 
fully overcome without co-ordinating legal with illegal work, 
without testing the "leaders" in the parliamentary arena, 
among others. The most merciless, cutting, uncompromising 
criticism must be directed, not against parliamentarism or par- 
liamentary action, but^ against those leaders_who are unable — 
and still more against those who do not wislv— to utilize par- 
liamentary elections and the parliamentary platform as revolu- 
tionaries and Communists should. Only such criticism — added,, 
of course, to the expulsion of worthless leaders and their 
replacement by capable ones — ^will constitute useful and fruit- 
ful revolutionary work. Thus will both the leaders themselves 



i 



be trained to become worthy of the working-class and the toil- 
ing masses, and the masses learn correctly to understand the 
p^tical situation, and to understand the often very compli- 
cated and intricate problems that originate from such 
situations.* 



• I have had very little opportunity to acquaint myself with -^'Left" 
Communism in Italy. Unquestionably, Comrade Bordig^a and his 
^roup of "ComnKunist-Boycottists" (Communista abstentionista) are 
wroner in defending* non-participation in Parliament. But it seems 
to me — from what I can gather from two issues of his paper* IL 
Soviet (Nos .3 and 4, January 18 and February 1, 1920), from four 
issues of Comrade Serrati's excellent periodical Communismo (Nos. 
1-4, October -November, 1919) and from scattered numbers of Italian 
bourcr^ois papers with which I have had the opportunity to acquaint 
myself — that they are right on one point. Comrade Bordiga and his 
group are riffht in their attacks on Turati and his co-thinkers, who 
remain in a party which has recognized Soviet power and prole- 
tarian dictatorship, and who at the same time continue their former 
detrimental and opportunistic policy as members of parliament. Of 
course, in suffering' this. Serrati and the whole Italian Socialist Party 
make a mistake which threatens to cause great harm and peril, a 
peril as erreat as that in Hungary, where the Hungarian Turatis 
sabotagred from within both the Party and the Soviet Government. 
Such a mistaken, inconsistent, or characterless attitude towards the 
opportunist parliamentarians, on the one hand, creates "Left" Com- 
munism, and, on the other, justifies its existence up to a certain point. 
Comrade Serrati is obviously in the wrong when he accuses Deputy 
Turati of "inconsistency" (Communiemo, No. 3) ; in point of fact, it is 
the Italian Socialist Party which is inconsistent, in putting* up with 
9^t^ opportunist parliamentarians as Turati and Co. 



CHAPTER VIII. 
NO COMPROMISE WHATEVER? t 



♦ "We are Communists," wrote the Communard Blanquists in their 
manifesto, "because we wish to attain our aim directly, without stop- 
ping: at intermediary stations, without any compromise, which only 
postpone the day of victory and prolongr the period of slavery." 

t Fr. Eng-els' Progrram of the Communard Blanquists, from the 
German S.D. paper Volkstaat, 1874, No. 73, in the collection of Art- 
icles of the Tears 1871-1875. (Russian translation, Petrograd, 1S19. 
pp. 52 and 53.) 



» 



We have seen, in the quotation from the Frankfurt pamphlet 1 

with what determination the "Left" put forward this slogan. 
It is sad to see how men who doubtless consider themselves 
Marxists, and who desire to be Marxists, have forgotten the 
fundamental truths of Marxism. This is what was written in 
1874 against the Manifesto of thirty-three Communard Blan- 
quists* by Engels, who, like Marx was one of those rarest of 
authors who in every sentence oi every great work show a 
wonderful profundity of content. 

"The German Communists are Communists because, through 
all intermediary stages and compromises, created not by them, 
but by the course of historical development, they clearly see 
and perpetually follow the one final end, the abolition of 
classes and the creation of a social system in which there will 
no longer be any place for private property in land or in the 
means of production. The thirty-three Blanquists are Com- 
munists because they imagine that, since they want to leap over 
intermediary stations and compromises, the cause is as good 
as won, and if (and of this they are firmly convinced) things 
"b^n moving" one of these days, the power will get into their 
hands, "then Communism will be introduced" the day after 
tomorrow. Consequently, if this cannot be done immediately, 
they are not Communists. What a childish naivete — ^to put 
forward one's own impatience as a theoreticaUargument I"t 



64 

In the same article Engels expresses his profound esteem for 
Vaillant, and speaks of the "undeniable merit" of the latter 
(who, like Guesde, was one of the most prominent leaders of 
international Socialism prior to August, 1914, when both 
turned traitor to the cause of Socialism). But Engels does not 
leave an apparent mistake without a detailed analysis. Of 
course, to very young and inexperienced revolutionists, as well 
as to petit-bourgeois revolutionists (even though very experi- 
enced and of a very respectable age), it seems most dangerous, 
incomprehensible and incorrect to allow compromises. And 
many sophists, by virtue of their being super- or over-"cic- 
perienced'' politicians, reason the same way as the English 
leaders of Opportunism, mentioned by Comrade Lansbury: — 
"If the Bolsheviks permit themselves compromises, why should 
not we be allowed them ?" But proletarians, schooled in mani- 
fold strikes (to take only this manifestation of the class war), 
usually comprehend perfectly this most profound (philosophi- 
cal, historical, political and psychological) truth, as ex- 
pounded by Engels. Every proletarian who has gone through 
strikes has experienced compromises with the hated oppressors 
and exploiters, when the workers had to get back to work, 
sometimes without obtaining their demands, sometimes con- 
senting to a partial compliance only. Every proletarian, be- 
cause of that state of the class struggle and intensification 
of class antagonisms in which he lives, distinguishes between 
a compromise extorted from him by objective conditions 
(such as lack of funds in the treasury, no support from with- 
out, starvation, and the last stage of exhaustion) — a com- 
promise which in no way lessens the revolutionary devotion 
and readiness of the worker to continue the struggle — and, 
on the other hand, the compromise of traitors, who ascribe 
to objective reasons their own selfishness (strike breakers 
also effect a "co;npromise"), to their cowardice, to their desire 
to fawn upon capitalists, and to their readiness to yield some- 
times to threats, sometimes to persuasion, sometimes to sops 
and flattery on the part of capitalists. Such treacherous com- 
promises are especially plentiful in the history of the English 
labor movement, made by leaders of the English trade unions ; 
but in one form or another nearly all workers in every country 
have witnessed similar instances. 



6? 

To be sure individual cases of exceptional difficulty and 
intricacy do occur, wken it is possible to determine the real 
character of such a compromise only with the greatest effort ; 
just as there are cases of murder in which it is anything 
but easy to decide whether the murder was full justifiable, 
and, in fact, necessary (as, for example, legitimate self-de- 
fense), or an unpardonable piece of negligence, or, again, a - 
skilfully premeditated treacherous plan. Of course, in politics, 
involving sometimes very intricate national or international 
relationships between classes and parties, many cases will arise 
much more difficult 4han the question of a lawful compromise 
during a strike, or the treasonable compromise of a strike- 
breaker, a traitorous leader, etc. To invent such a formula 
or general rule as "No Compromises/' which would serve 
in all cases, is an absurdity. One must keep one's head in 
order not to lose oneself in each separate case. Therein, by 
the way, lies the importance of a party organization and of 
party leaders worthy of the name, that, in long, stubborn, 
varied, and variform struggle, all thinking representatives of 
a given class may work out the necessary knowledge, the 
necessary experience, and, apart from all knowledge and 
experience, the necessary political instincts for the quick and 
correct solution of intricate political problems.* 

Naive and quite inexperienced persons imagine that it is 
sufficient to recognize the permissibility of compromise in 
general, and all differences between opportunism on the one 
hand (with which we do and must wage uncompromising 
war) and revolutionary Marxism or Communism on the other 
will be obliterated. But for those people who -do not yet 
know that all distinctions in nature and in society are unstable 
(and, to a certain extent, arbitrary), nothing will do but a 
long process of training, education, enlightenment, political and 
everyday experience. In practical questions of the policy 
appropriate to each separate or specific historic movement it 



* So long- as classes exist, so long as non-class society has not fully 
entrenched and consolidated itself, has not developed itself on its 
own foundation, there inevitably will be in every class, and even in 
the most enlightened countries, class representatives who neither 
think nor are capable of thinking. Capitalism would not be the op- 
pressor of the masses that it is, were this not so. 



is important to be able to distinguish those in which are matii- 
fested the main species of inadmissible treacherous com- 
promises, which embody opportunism detrimental to the revo- 
lutionary class, and to direct all possible efforts towards 
elucidating and fighting them. During the imperialist war 
of 1914-1918, between two groups of equally ruffianly and 
rapacious countries, such a main fundamental species of op- 
portunism was social-chauvinism, that is, upholding "defense 
of the Fatherland," which, in such a war, was really equivalent 
to a defense of the plundering interests of one's own bour- 
geoisie. Since the Avar, the defense of the robber "League 
of Nations"; the defense of direct or in(iirect alliance with 
the bourgeoisie of one's country against the revolutionary 
proletariat and the "Soviet" movement; the defense of bour- 
geois democracy and bourgeois parliamentarism against 
"Soviet power;" such are the chief manifestations of those 
inadmissible and treacherous compromises which, taken all 
in all, have given rise to an opportunism fatal to the revolu- 
tionary proletariat and its cause. "With all determination 
to reject all compromise with other parties ... all policy 
of temporizing and manoeuvring" write the German "Left" in 
the Frankfurt pamphlet. 

If is to be wondered at that, holding such views, the Left do 
not decisively condemn Bolshevism ! Surely it is not possible 
that the German Left were unaware that the whole history 
of Bolshevism, both before and after the October Revolution, 
is full of instances of manoeuvring, temporizing and com- 
promising with others, the bourgeois parties included ! 

To carry on a war for the overthrow of the international 
bourgeoisie, a war a hundred times rnore difficult, prolonged 
and complicated than the most stubborn of ordinary wars 
between countries, and to refuse beforehand to manoeuvre, to 
utilize the conflict (even though temporary) of interests be- 
tween one's enemies; to refuse co-operation and compromise 
with possible (even though transient, unstable, vacillating, 
and conditional) allies — is not this an infinitely laughable 
thing? Is it not as though, in the difficult ascent of an unex- 
plored and heretofore inaccessible mountain, we were to re- 
nounce beforehand the idea that we might have to go some- 



^1 

times in zig-zags, sometimes retracing our steps, sometimes 
giving up the course once selected and trying various others ? 
And people who are so ignorant and inexperienced (it is all 
right if this is due to their youth — ^the Lord Himself has 
ordained that during a certain time the young should talk such 
nonsense) are supported in this uncompromising attitude — 
directly or indirectly, openly or covertly, wholly or partially — 
by certain Dufch Communists ! 

After the first Socialist revolution of the proletariat, upon 
the overthrow of the bourgeoisie in a country, the proletariat 
remains for a time- weaker than the bourgeoisie, simply by 
virtue of the latter's far-reaching international connections, 
and also on account of the ceaseless and spontaneous re-birth 
of capitalism and the bourgeoisie, through the small producers 
of commodities in the country which has overthrown them. 
To overcome so potent an enemy is possible only through the 
greatest effort and by dint of the obligatory, thorough, careful, 
attentive and skilful! utilization of every breach, however 
small, betAveen the enemies ; of every clash of interests between 
the bourgeoisie of all countries, between various groups and 
species of bourgeoisie within individual countries ; of every 
possibility, however small, of gaining an ally, even though 
he be temporary, shaky, unstable, unreliable and conditional. 
Who has "not grasped this has failed to grasp one iota of 
Marxism and *6f scientific modern Socialism in general. Who- 
ever has failed "^to prove in practice, during a considerable 
period of time and insufficiently varied political situations, 
his ability to apply this truth, ,has not yet learned to aid the 
revolutionary class in its struggle for the liberation of all 
toiling humanity from qts exploiters. All this applies equally 
to the period before and after the conquest of political power 
• by the proletariat. 

Our theory is not a dogma but a manual of action, said 
Marx and Engels ; and the greatest mistake, the greatest crime 
of "patented" Marxists like Karl Kautsky, Otto Bauer, etc., 
is that they have not understood this, that they were unable 
to apply it in the most important moments of the proletarian 
revolution. ^'Political activity is not the pavement of the 
Nevsky Prospect," (the clean, broad, level pavement of the 



68 

perfectly straight main street in Pctrograd) N. G. Chemishcv- 
sky, the great Russian Socialist in the prc-Marxian period, 
used to say. The Russian revolutionaries, from the time of 
Chcrnishevsky, have paid with innumerable victims for ignor- 
ing or forgetting this truth. It is necessary by every means 
to prevent Left Communists and West European and Ameri- 
can revolutionaries who are devoted to the working class from 
paying as dearly for the assimilation of this truth as did the 
backward Russians. 

Before the downfall of Czarism, the Russian revolutionary 
Social Democrats made use repeatedly of the service of the 
bourgeois Liberals — i, e., concluded numerous practical com- 
promises with them. In 1901-2, before the rise of Bolshevism, 
the old editorial staff of Iskra (comprising Plekhanoff, Axel- 
rod, Zasulitch, Martoif, Potressoff, and myself) concluded a 
formal, although short-lived, political alliance with Struve, 
the political leader of bourgeois Liberalism, and succeeded at 
the same time in waging a most merciless ideological and politi- 
cal war against bourgeois Liberalism and against the slightest 
manifestation of its influence within the working class move- 
ment. The Bolsheviks always continued the same policy. 
From 1905 they systematically advocated a union of the work- 
ing class and peasantry against the Liberal bourgeoisie and 
Czarispi. At the same time they never refused to support 
the bourgeoisie against Czarism (for instance, during the 
second stage of the election, or in recounts) , and never ceased 
the most irreconcilable ideological and political fight against 
the bourgeois revolutionary peasant party, the "Socialist Revo- 
lutionaries," exposing them as petit bourgeois democrats, 
falsely masquerading as Socialists. 

In 1907 the Bolsheviks, for a short time, formed a formal 
political bloc in the Duma elections with the "Socialist Revolu- 
tionaries." Between 1903 and 1912 we were for several years 
formally united with the Mensheviks in one Social-Democratic 
party, never ceasing our ideological and political fight with 
them, as opportunists and transmitters of bourgeois influence 
to the proletariat. During the war we accepted some com- 
promise with the "Kautskians," who were partly Left Men- 
sheviks (Martoff) and partly "Socialist Revolutionaries" 



(Tchernoff and Natanson), sitting together with them in' 
Zimmerwald and Kienthal, and issuing manifestoes in com- 
mon ; but we never ceased and never slackened our ideologico- 
poHtical fight with the "Kautskians," Martoff and Tchernoff 
(Natanson died in 1919, quite near to us, being a "Revolu- 
tionary Communist" — Narodnik — and almost agreeing with 
us.) At the very moment of the October Revolution we 
effected an informal (a very important and highly successful) 
political bloc with the petit bourgeois peasantry, having ac" 
cepted fully, without a single change, the "Socialist Revolu- 
tionary" agrarian program— that is, we effected an undeniable 
compromise, in order to prove to the peasants that we do not 
want to dominate them, but to come to an understanding with 
them. At the same time we proposed, and soon realized, a 
formal political bloc with the "Left Socialist Revolutionaries," 
involving working together in the same Government. They 
broke up this bloc after the conclusion of the Brest Peace, 
and then went as far as an armed insurrection against us in 
July, 1918. Subsequently they began an armed struggle 
against us. 

It is therefore comprehensible why all the attacks made 
by the German "Left" upon the Central Committee of the 
Communist Party of Germany (because the latter entertained 
the idea of a bloc with the "Independent Social Democratic 
Party of Germany," the Kautskians) seem to us not at all 
serious, and prove to us the palpable error of the "Left." We 
in Russia also had Right Mensheviks (who participated in 
the Kerensky Government and who correspond to the German 
Scheidemanns) and Left Mensheviks (Martoff) who were in 
opposition to the Right Wing, and who correspond to the 
German Kautskians. We clearly observed, in 1917, how the 
working masses were gradually abandoning the Mensheviks 
to come over to the Bolsheviks. At the first All-Russian 
Congress of Soviets, in June, 1917, we had only 13%; the 
majority of votes were for the Socialist Revolutionaries and 
the Mensheviks. At the Second Congress of Soviets (Octo- 
ber 25, 1917— old style) we had 51%. Why, in Germany, 
did a wholly similar movement of the workers from Right to 
Left first strengthen, not the Communists, but the intermediate 



70 



party of the "Independents"? — although this party never had 
any independent political idea of its own, no independent policy 
of its own, but only wavered between the Scheidemanns and 
the Communists. 

Obviously, one of the causes was the erroneous tactics of 
the German Communists, who must fearlessly and honestly 
admit this mistake and learn to correct it. The mistake con- 
sisted in rejecting participation in the reactionary bourgeois 
parliament and in the reactionary Trade Unions ; it consisted 
in the numerous manifestations of that "Left" infantile dis- 
order which has now appeared on the- surface. And the 
quicker it does so, the better ; the more beneficial to the organ- 
ism will be the cure. 

The German "Independent Social-Democratic Party*^ is 
obviously not homogeneous. The old opportunist leaders 
(Kautsky, Hilferding, and, to a considerable extent it seems, 
Crispien, Ledebour and others), have proven their inability 
to understand Soviet pov;er and dictatorship of the proletariat, 
their inability to lead the latter in its revolutionary struggle. 
Side by side with them, there has arisen in this party a Left 
proletarian wing which is growing with admirable rapidity. 
Hundreds of thousands of members of this party (and it has, 
it seems, up to three-quarters of a million members) are pro- 
letarians who have left Scheidemann and are marching rapidly 
towards Communism. This proletarian wing has already pro- 
posed (at the Liepzig, 1919, Conference of the Independents) 
an immediate and unconditonal affiliation with the Third In- 
ternational. To fear a "compromise" with this wing of the 
party is really laughable. On the contrary it is incumbent ' 
upon Communists to seek and to find an appropriate form of 
compromise with them ; such a compromise, as, on the one hand, 
would facilitate and accelerate the necessary complete fusion 
with this wing and, on the other, would in no way tie the hands 
of the Communists in their ideo-political struggle against the 
opportunist Right wing of the Independents. Probably it 
will not be easy to work out the appropriate form of com- 
promise, but only a charlatan could promise to the German 
workmen and Communists an easy way to victory. 

Capitalism would not be capitalism if the proletariat "pure 



n 

and simple" were not surrounded by a great many exceedingly 
variegated and transitory types between the proletarian to the 
semi-proletarian (who earns a livelihood halfway by selling 
his labor-power) ; from the semi-proletarian to the small peas- 
ant (and small craftsman, handicraft worker, and small master 
in general) ; from the small to the middle peasant and so on; 
and if, within the proletariat itself, there were no dwisions 
into more and less advanced sections — friendly, professional 
and sometimes religious societies, etc. And this gives rise to 
the absolute, imperative necessity for the conscious part of the 
proletarian vanguard, the Communist Party, to resort to 
manoeuvres, temporizings, and compromises with the various 
groups of proletarians, with the various parties, with the work- 
men and petit masters. 

The whole point lies in being able to apply these tactics to 
raise and not to lower the general level of proletarian class- 
consciousness and revolutionary ability to fight and conquer. 
It is noteworthy, by the way, that the victory of the Bol- 
sheviks over the Mensheviks demanded, not only before the 
October revolution of 1917, but also after it, the application 
of such tactics, of manoeuvring, temporizing and (fompromise — 
such, of course, as would facilitate, accelerate, consolidate the 
Bolsheviks at the expense of the Mensheviks. The petit bour- 
geois democrats (including the Mensheviks) invariably vacil- 
late between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, between 
bourgeois democracy and the Soviet system, between reform- 
ism and revolution, between love for the workers and fear 
of the proletarian dictatorship, etc. The correct tactics of 
the Comfiiunists should consist in utilizing these vacillations, 
and by no means to ignore them. Utilization demands con- 
cessions to the element that turns towards the proletariat. 
The time, the direction and the extent of these concessions 
must be determined by circumstances ; the questions to be con- 
sidered being simply when and how far those elements turn 
towards the proletariat. At the same time a fight must be 
waged against the elements which turn towards the bour- 
geoisie. As a result of the application of correct tactics, 
Menshevism, disintegrated more and more, is now falling to 
pieces; the obstinately oppoijunist leaders are being deserted, 



n 

and the best workers, the best elements from the petit bour- 
geois democracy, are being brought into our camp. This is 
a long process, and the hasty decision : "No compromise, no 
manoeuvring" can only prevent the strengthening of the in- 
fluence of the revolutionary proletariat, and the increasing of 
its force. 

Finally, one of the obvious mistakes of the "Left" in 
Germany is their unequivocal refusal to recognize the Ver- 
sailles Treaty. The more "solidly" and "importantly," the 
more "determinedly" and dogmatically this viewpoint is main- 
tained (by K. Horner, for instance), the less sensible it ap- 
pears. It is not sufficient, in th^ present conditions of the 
international proletarian revolution, to renounce the crying 
absurdities of "National Bolshevism" (Lauffenberg and 
others), which has talked itself into a bloc with the German 
bourgeoisie for war against the Entente. One must undet-- 
stand those tactics to be fundamentally wrong which do not 
admit that it is necessary for a Soviet Germany (if a German 
Soviet Republic were shortly to be established) to recognize 
the Versailles Peace, and to submit to it for a certain time. 
From this it -does not follow that the German "Independents" 
were right when they demanded the signing of the Versailles 
Treaty. At that time Scheidemann was in the government; 
the Sioviet Government of Hungary had not yet been over- 
thrown, and there was yet a possibility of a Soviet revolution 
in Vienna in support of Soviet Hungary. Then the Inde- 
gendents temporized and manoeuvred very clumsily, for they 
more or less took upon themselves the responsibility for the 
Scheidemann traitors, slipped away, more or less, from the 
viewpoint of a merciless (and calmly deliberate) class war 
with the Sheidemanns, and adopted a non-class, or "super- 
class," viewpoint. 

But at present the position is obviously such that the Ger- 
man Communists should not bind themselves hand and foot 
and take upon themselves the irrevocable obligation of re- 
pudiating the Versailles Treaty in the case of the victory of 
Communism. That would be foolish. One must admit that 
the Scheidemanns and Kautskians have perpetuated a great 
many treacheries, obstructing, and in part ruining, the work 



1 



73 

of union with Soviet Russia and with Soviet Hungary. We 
Communists will use all means to facilitate and prepare such 
a union ; at the same time, we are not at all bound to repudiate 
the Versailles Treaty — or, what is more, to repudiate it im- 
mediately. The possibility of successfully repudiating the 
Treaty depends, not only upon the German, but also upon the 
international success of the Soviet movement. This move- 
ment was hampered by the Scheidemanns and Kautskians; 
we shall help it. Therein lies the main point; that is where 
the fundamental difference lies. And if our class enemies 
the exploiters, their lackeys the Scheidemanns land Kautskians, 
have missed a great many opportunities for strengthening 
both the German and the international Soviet revolution, the 
blame falls upon them. The Soviet revolution in Germany 
will strengthen the international Soviet movement. This is 
the strongest bulwark — and the only reliable, unconquer- 
able, omnipotent bulwark — against the Versailles Peace, 
against international imperialism in general. To put 
the overthrow of the Versailles Peace absolutely and 
irrevocably in the first place, before the question of the 
liberation of other countries from the yoke of imperialism, 
is a species of petit-bourgeois nationalism (worthy of Kautsky, 
Hilferding, Otto Bauer and Co.) and is not revolutionary 
internationalism. The overthrow of the bourgeoisie in any of 
the large European countries, including Germany, is such an 
accession to the international revolution that for its sake one 
can, and must if necessary, suffer a longer duration of the 
Versailles Peace. If Russia by herself, with benefit to the 
revolution, could endure the Brest Peace for several months, 
it is not impossible for Soviet Germany, in alliance with Soviet 
Russia, to suffer, with benefit to the revolution, a still longer 
duration of the Versailles Treaty. 

The imperialists of France, England, etc., are provoking 
the German Communists, and laying a trap for them. "Say 
that you will not sign the Peace of Versailles," they say. And 
the Left Communists, like children, fall into the trap laid for 
them, instead of manoeuvring skilfully against the treacherous 
and, for the moment, stronger enemy; instead of telling him 
"Today we shall adhere to the Versailles Treaty." To bind 



one's hands beforehand, openly to tell the enemy, who is now 
better armed than we are, whether or not we shall fight him, 
is stupidity and not revolutionism. To accept battle when this 
is obviously profitable to the enemy, and not to oneself, is ^ 
crime; and those politicians of the revolutionary class who 
are unable to "manoeuvre, temporize, compromise," in order 
to evade an obviously unprofitable battle, are good for nothing. 



CHAPTER IX. 
''LEFT' COMMUNISM IN GREAT BRITAIN. 

In Britain there is as yet no Communist Party,* but there 
is a young, extensive, potent Communist movement, rapidly 
growing among the workers, which entitles one to entertain 
the brightest hope. There are, moreover, several political par- 
ties and organizations (the British Socialist Party, the Socialist 
Labor Party, the South Wales Socialist Society, and the Work- 
ers' Socialist Federation) which are desirous of forming a 
Conmiunist Party and which are carrying on negotiations 
among themselves to that effect. In the Workers' Dread- 
nought (Vol. vi. No. 48, February 21, 1920), the weekly organ 
of the last above-named organizations, edited by Comrade 
Sylvia Parkhurst, she publishes an article "Towards the Com- 
munist Party." The article describes th^ course of n^otia- 
tions between the four above-mentioned organizations regard- 
ing the formation of a single Communist Party on the basis 
of affiliation to the Third International, acknowledgment of 
the Soviet System instead of parliamentarism, and the dicta- 
torship of the proletariat. It appears that one of the chief 
obstacles^ to the immediate creation of a single Communist 
Pacty is Ae difference of opinion on the question of participa- 
tion in Parliament, and on the affiliation of the new Com- 
munist Party to the old professionalist Labor Party, composed 
of Trade Unions, opportunists, and social-chauvinist. The 
Workers' Socialist Federation, as well as the Socialist Labor 
Party ,t are against participation in Parliament and Parlia- 
mentary elections ; they are also against affiliation to the Labor 
Party, disagreeing in this respect with all, or a majority of, 



• Written before the formation of the Communist Party of Great 
Britain in August, 1920. 

1 1 believe this party (the S. L. P.) is against affiliation with the 
Labor Party, but not all of its members oppose participation in Par- 
liament. 



the members of the British Socialist Party — "the right wing 
of the Communist parties in England," according to the edi- 
tor's way of looking at it. 

Thus the principal division here is the same as in Ger- 
many, notwithstanding the enormous differences in the way 
in which these differences manifest themselves, and a whole 
series of other circumstances. In Germany this form much 
more nearly approaches the Russian than in England. Let 
us have a look at the arguments of the "Left." 

On the question of participation in Parliament, Comrade 
Sylvia Pankhurst refers to an article of Comrade W. Gal- 
lacher, printed in the sajne issue, who writes in the name of 
the Scottish Workers' Committee of Glasgow: 

"This CcMnmittee (S. W. C.) is definitely anti-Parliamen- 
tarian, and has behind it the Left wing of the various political 
bodies. 

"We represent the revolutionary movement in Scotland, 
striving continually to build up a revolutionary organization 
within the different branches of industry, and a Communist 
Party, based on social committees, throughout the country 
For a considerable time we have been sparring with the official 
parliamentarians. We have not considered it necessary to 
declare open warfare on them, and they are afraid to open an 
attack on us. 

"But this state of affairs cannot continue long. We are 
winning all along the line. The rank and file of the L L. P. 
in Scotland is becoming more and more disgusted with the idea 
of Parliament, and the Soviets or Workers' Councils are being 
supported by almost every branch. 

**This is very serious, of course, for the gentlemen who 
look to politics for a profession, and they are using any and 
every means to persuade their members to come back into 
the Parliamentary fold. Revolutionary comrades must not 
give any support to this gang. Our fight here is going to 
be a difficult one. One of the worst features of it will be the 
treachery of those whose personal ambition is a more com- 
pelling force than their regard for the revolution. 



it' 



ti-^ 



77 

"Any support given to Parliamentarism is simply helping 
to put power into the hands of our British Sheidemanns and 
Noskes. Henderson, Clynes and Co. are hopelessly reaction- 
ary. The official I. L. P. is more and more coming under the 
control of middle-class Liberals, who, since the rout of the 
Liberal Party, have found their 'spiritual home' in the camp 
of Messrs. MacDonald, Snowden and Co. The official I. L. P. 
is bitterly hostile to the Third International, the rank and file 
is for it. Any support to the Parliamentary opportunists is 
simply playing into the hands of the former. 

The B. S. P. here simply cuts no ice. . . . 

'What is wanted here is a sound, revolutionary, industrial 
organization and a Communist Party working along clear, 
well-defined, scientific lines. If our comrades can assist us 
in building these, we will take their help gladly; if they can- 
not, for God's sake let them keep out altogether, lest they 
betray the Revolution by lending their support to the reac- 
tionaries, who are so eagerly clamoring for Parliamentary 
'honors' (? — ^the query belongs to the author of the letter), 
and who are so anxious to prove that they can rule as effec- 
tively as the 'Boss' class politicians themselves." 

This letter to the editor splendidly expresses, in my opinion, 
the frame of mind and the viewpoint of young Communists, 
or of^he rank and file of the workers who have just begun 
to arrive at Communism. This frame of mind is highly wel- 
come and valuable; it is necessary to appreciate and support 
it, as, without it, the victory of the proletarian revolution in 
Britain, or in any other country, would be hopeless People 
who are able to express such a disposition of the masses, who 
are able to awaken in them such a mood (which often lies 
dormant, unconscious, and unawakened) should be cared for 
attentively and every assistance rendered them. At the same 
time, they must be told, frankly and openly, that that mood 
alone is not sufficient to guide the masses in the great revo- 
lutionary struggle, and that people devoted to the cause of 
the revolution may make mistakes which do actual harm to 
that cause itself. Comrade Gallacher's letter to the editor 
reveals, without doubt, in embryo all the errors which are 



Ik 



78 

being made by the German "Left" Communists, and which 
were committed by the Russian "Left" Bolsheviks in the years 
1908 and 1918. , ^ : 

The author of the letter is full of the noblest proletarian 
hate towards class politicians of the bourgeoisie; and his hate 
is comprehensible and dear, not only to the proletariat, but 
to all toilers, to all "little people," to use the German ex- 
pression. This hatred of the representative of oppressed and 
exploited masses is, indeed, "the beginning of all wisdom"; 
it is the basis of every Socialist and Communist movement 
and of its success. The author, however, evidently jdoes not 
take into consideration the fact that politics is a science and 
an art which does not drop from the skies, and which cannot 
be obtained for nothing; and that the proletariat, if it wishes 
to overcome the bourgeoisie, must create for itself its own, 
proletarian, "class politicians," as capable as bourgeois poli 
ticians. 

The author of the letter has understood excellently that 
not Parliament but Workers' Councils will be the way by 
which the proletariat will achieve its end; of course, those 
who have not yet understood this are the most vicious reac- 
tionaries, even though they be the most learned men, the most 
erudite Marxists, the most honest citizens and fathers of 
families. The author of the letter does not, however, even 
think of putting the question as to whether or not it is pos- 
sible for the Soviets to vanquish Parliament without 
introducing "Soviet" workers into the latter, without disin- 
tegrating Parliament from within, without preparing inside 
Parliament the success of Soviets in the impending struggle 
for the dispersion of Parliament. At the same time, however, 
the author of the letter expresses the thorpughly right idea 
that the Communist Party in England must act upon a scien- 
tific basic. Science demands, in the first place, an evaluation 
of the experience of other countries, especially if those others 
are undergoing or have recently undergone a very similar ex- 
perience ; in the second place, it demands an evaluation of all 
forces, groups, parties, classes, masses, acting within the given 
country, and the determination of one's policy not merely ac- 



A 



79 

cording to the strength of the desires and views of one group 
or party, according to its degree of class consciousness and 
readiness for the struggle. 

That the Hendersons, Clynes, McDonalds and Snowdens are 
hopelessly reactionary is true. It is also true that they want 
to take the power into their own hands (preferring, however, 
a coalition with the bourgeoisie), that they want to govern 
according to the same old rules of the bourgeoisie, and that 
they will inevitably behave, when in power, like the Scheide- 
manns and the Noskes. All this is true, but it does not neces- 
sarily follow that to support them means treason to the revo- 
lution ; on the contrary, in the interests of the revolution, the 
revolutionaries of the working class must render to these gen- 
tlemen a certain parliamentary support. 

To make this thought clearer, I shall take two contem- 
porary English political documents, (1) the speech of Lloyd 
George, on March 18, 1920, as published in the Manchester 
Guardian on the following day, and (2) the arguments of the 
"Left" Communist, Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst, in her above- 
mentioned article. 

Lloyd George in his speech argued against Asquith (who 
was specially invited to the meeting, but refused to appear) 
and those Liberals who desire, not a coalition with the Con- 
servatives, but a closer connection with the Labor Party. (In 
the letter of Comrade Gallacher we also find mention of the 
fact that Liberals are going over to the Independent Labor 
Party.) Lloyd George sought to prove that a coalition of the 
Liberals with the Conservatives, and a close one at that, was 
necessary, otherwise victory would be on the side of the Labor 
Party, which Lloyd George prefers to call "Socialist," and 
which strives towards collective ownership of the means of 
production. "In France it was known as Communism," the 
leader of the English bourgeoisie explained to his hearers 
(members of the Liberal Party who probably up to that time 
had been unaware of it), "in Germany it was known as So- 
cialism, and in Russia it is known as Bolshevism." For the 
Liberals, explained Lloyd George, this is unacceptable on prin- 
ciplei as the Liberals on principle are for private property. 



so 

"Civilization is in jeopardy," declared the orator, and,.tficrc- 
fore, the Liberals and Conservatives must unite. 

"If you go to the agricultural areas," said Lloyd CJeorge, 
"I agree that you have the old party divisions as strong as 
ever; they are far removed from the danger. It docs not 
walk in their lanes. But when they see it they will be as 
strong as some of these industrial constituencies now are. 
Four-fifths of this country is industrial and commercial; 
hardly one-fifth is agricultural. It is one of the things I have 
constantly in my mind when I think of the dangers of the 
future here. In France the population is agricultural, and you 
have a solid body of opinion which does not move very rap- 
idly, and which is not easily excited by revolutionary move- 
ments. That is not the case here. This country is more top- 
heavy than any country in the world, and if it begins to rock, 
the crash here, for that reason, will be greater than in any 
other land." 

The reader sees from this that Mr. Lloyd George is not 
only a very clever man, but that he has learned much from the 
Marxists. It would not be committing a sin for Us to learn 
something from Mr. Lloyd George. 

It is interesting to note the follo\^ing -questions put after 
Mr. Lloyd George's speech: — Mr. Wallace: "I should like 
to ask what the Prime Minister considers the effect might be 
in industrial constituencies upon the industrial workers, so 
many of whom are Liberals at the present time ^nd from 
'whom we get so much support. Would not a possible result 
be to cause an immediate overwhelming accession of strength 
to the Labor party from men who, at the present time, are 
our cordial supporters*'? The Prime Minister: "I take a 
totally different view. The fact that Liberals are fighting 
among themselves undoubtedly drives a -very considerable 
number of Liberals in despair to the Labor Party, where you 
get a considerable body of Liberals, very able men, whose 
business it is to discredit the Government. The result is un- 
doubtedly to bring a good accession of the public sentiment to 
the Labor Party. It does not go to the Liberals who are out- 
side, it goes to the Labor Party, the by-elections show that/' 

By way of remark this discussion specially shows how the 




cleverest of the bourgeoisie have got into a muddle, and can- 
not help committing irreparable blunders. It is from this that 
the bourgeoisie will perish. Our people may commit stupid- 
ities, it is true, but so long as these stupidities be not vital and 
be corrected in time, we shall none tihe less conquer in the 
end. 

Another political document gives the following arguments 
of the "Left'* Communist, Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst: — 

Comrade Inkpin (secretary of the British Socialist Party) 
refers to the Labor Party as "the main body of the work- 
ing-class movement." Another comrade of the B. S. P., at 
the conference of the Third International just held, put the 
B. S. P. position more strongly. He said : "We regard the 
Labor Party as the organized working class." 

We do not take this view of the Labor Party. The Labor 
party is very large numerically, thoiigh its membership is to 
a great extent quiescent and apathic, consisting of men and 
women who have joined the Trade Unions because their 
workmates are Trade Unionists and to share the friendly 
benefits. But we recognize that the great size of the Labor 
Party is also due to the fact that it is the creation of a 
school of thought beyond which the majority of the British 
working class has not yet emerged, though great changes are 
at work in the minds of the people, which will presently alter 
this state of aflfairs. The British Labor* Party, like the so- 
cial-patriotic organizations of other countries, will, ia the 
natural development of society, inevitably come into power. 
It is for the Communists to build up the forces which will 
overthrow the social-patriots, and in this country we must 
not delay or falter in that work. 

We must not dissipate our energy in adding to the 
strength of the Labor Party ; its rise to power is inevitable. 
We must concentrate on making a Communist movement 
that will vanquish it. The Labor Party will soon be form- 
ing a government; the revolutionary opposition must get 
ready to attack it. 

And so, the Liberal bourgeoisie renounce the bi-party sys- 
tem of the exploiters — ^historically sanctified by centuries of 



8? 

experience, and highly profitable to the exploiters — finding it 
necessary to join their forces for the fight against the Labor 
Party. Part of the Liberals, like rats deserting a sinking ship, 
run over to the Labor Party. The Left Communists find it 
inevitable that the power will fall into the hands of the Labor 
Party, and admit that at the present time the latter is backed 
by a majority of working men. From this they draw the 
strange conclusion which Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst expresses 
as follows: — 

A Commtmist Party must not enter into compromises. ... 
A Communist Party must keep its doctrine pure, and its in- 
dependence of reformism inviolate; its mission is to lead 
the way, without stopping or turning, by the direct road to 
the Communist revolution. 

On the contrary, since the majority of the workers in 
Britain still support the British Scheidemanns arid Kerenskys ; 
since they have not yet experienced a government composed 
of such men, which experience was necessary in Russia and 
Germany before there was an exodus of the masses towards 
Communism, it follows without any doubt that the British 
Communists must participate in Parliament. They must from 
within Parliament help the workers to see in practice the re- 
sults of the Henderson and Snowden government; they must 
help the Hendersons and Snowdens to vanquish Lloyd George 
and Churchill united. To act otherwise means to hamper the 
progress, of the revolution; because, without an alteration in 
the views of the majority of the working class, revolution is 
impossible; and this change can be brought about by the 
political experience of tjie masses only, and never through 
propaganda alone. If an indisputably weak minority of the 
workers say "Forward-, without compromise, without stopping 
or turning,'* their slogan is, on the face of it, wrong. They 
know, or at least they should know, that the majority, in the 
event of Henderson's and Snowden's victory over Lloyd 
George and Churchill, will, after a short time, be disappointed 
in its leaders, and will come over to communism — or at any 
rate to neutrality and, in most cases, to benevolent neutrality 
towards the Communists. It is as though ten thousand sol- 
diers were to throw themselves into battle against fifty thou- 



83 

sand of the enemy at a time when a reinforcement of one 
hundred thousand men is expected but is not immediately 
available ; obviously, it is necessary at such a moment to stop, 
to turn, even to effect a compromise. This no-compromise 
slogan is intellectual childishness, and not the serious tactics 
of the revolutionary class. 

The fundamental law of revolution confirmed by all revolu- 
tions, and particularly by all three Russian revolutions of the 
twentieth century, is as follows: It is not sufficient for the 
revolution that the exploited and oppressed masses under- 
stand the impossibility of living in the old way and demand 
changes; for the revolution it is necessary that the exploiters 
should not be able to live and rule as of old. Only when the 
masses do not zvant the old regime, and when the rulers are 
unable to govern as of old, then only can the revolution suc- 
ceed. This truth may be expressed in other words: revolu- 
tion is impossible without an all-national crisis, affecting both 
the exploited and the exploiters. It follows that for the 
revolution it is essential, first, that a majority of the workers 
(or at least a majority of the conscious, thinking, politically 
active workers) should fully understand the necessity for a 
revolution, and be ready to sacrifice their lives for it ; second, 
that the ruling class be in a state of governmental crisis which 
attracts even the most backward masses into politics. It is a 
sign of every real revolution, this rapid tenfold, or even hun- 

. dredfold, increase in the number of representatives of the 
toiling and oppressed masses, heretofore apathetic, who are 

^able to carry on a political fight which weakens the govern- 
,;/: .ment and facilitates its overthrow by the revolutionaries. 

In Britain, as is seen specifically from Lloyd George's 
speech, both conditions for a successful proletarian revolution 
are obviously developing. And mistakes on the part of the 
Left Communists are now all the more dangerous just because 
some revolutionaries show an insufficiently penetrating, in- 
sufficiently attentive, conscious and foreseeing attitude, towards 
each of these conditions. If we are not a revolutionary group, 
but a party of the revolutionary class, and wish to carry the 
masses with us (without which we run the risk of remaining 
mere babblers), we must first help Henderson and Snowden 



84 

to defeat Lloyd George and Churchill ; or, to be more explicit, 
we must compel the former to defeat the latter, for the former 
are afraid of their victory! Seccwidly, we must help the ma- 
jority of the working class to convince themselves, through 
their own experience, that we are right; that is, they must 
convince themselves of the utter worthlessness of the Hender- 
sons and Snowdens, of their petit-bourgeois and treacherous 
natures, of the inevitability of their bankruptcy. Thirdly, we 
must accelerate the moment when, through the disappointment 
of the majority of the workers with the Hendersons, it will 
be possible, with serious chances of success, to overthrow the 
Henderson government — which will most certainly lose its 
head if the clever leader of^ n6t the *petit, but grand bour- 
geoisie, Lloyd George himself, loses his wits so completely 
and more weakens himself — and with himself^ the whole bour- 
geois party — ^yesterday through his "collisions" with Churchill, 
today with his "collisions" with Asquith. 

Let me speak more concretely. The British Communists 
must, in my opinion, unite all their four parties and groups (all 
of them very weak, some very, very weak into one single Com- 
munist Party, on the platform of the principles of the Third 
International, with obligatory participation in Parliament. The 
Communist Party must offer to the Hendersons and Snowdens 
a compromise, an electoral understanding: — ^"Let us go to- 
gether against the union of Lloyd George and Churchill; let 
us divide the seats in Parliament according to the number of 
votes cast by the workers for the Labor Party or the Com- 
munists (not in the elections but by a special poll), we to 
retain the fullest freedom of agitation, propaganda, and 
political activity." Without the latter condition there can, 
of course, be no bloc, for this would be treason; the British 
Communists must and will stand up for and maintain the 
fullest liberty in exposing the Hendersons and Spowdens, as 
did the Russian Bolsheviks for fifteen years (1903-1917) in 
relation to the Russian Hendersons and Snowdens, that is, the 
Mensheviks. 

If the Hendersons and Snowdens accept the bloc on these 
conditions, then we are the gainers, for it is altogether im- 
material how many seats in Parliament we get. On this point 



^ 

\ 



1 



ft5 

we shall make more concessions so loag as the Hendersons, 
and especially their new friends (or should it be their new 
masters?) the Liberals, who have gone over to the Indepen- 
dent Labor Party — ^are keenest on this. We are the gainers, 
for we shall carry our propaganda into the masses at the very 
moment when Lloyd George himself has thrown the Labor 
Party a challenge; and we shall help,, not only the Labor 
Party to form its Government the more speedily, but also the 
masses the sooner to understand our Communist propaganda, 
which we shall carry on ceaselessly against the Hendersons, 
overlooking nothing. 

• K the Hendersons and Snowdens reject a bloc on these 
conditions, we shall gain still more. For we have at once 
thus shown to the masses that the Hendersons prefer jtheir 
own nearness to the capitalists to the unification of all the 
woiicers. In this connection it is to be noticed that even in 
purely Menshevik circles — t. e,, the entirely opportunist inde- 
pendent Labor Party — ^the rank and file are for Soviets. We 
have at once gained in the eyes of the masses ; they, after the 
highly accurate exposure of Lloyd George — highly useful 
for Communists — will s)rmpathize with unification of all 
workers against the coalition of Lloyd George and Churchill. 
We score again in demonstrating that the Hendersons and 
Snowdens are afraid to defeat Lloyd George, are afraid to 
take the power alone, and are striving secretly to gain the 
support of Lloyd George, who is openly stretching a hand to 
Churchill against the Labor Party. 

It should be noted that in Russia, after the revolution of 
February 27, 1917 (old style), the propaganda of the Bol- 
sheviks gainst the Mensheviks and Socialist Revolutionaries 
(i, e., the Russian Hendersons and Snowdens) gained on ac- 
coimt of precisely similar circumstances. We said to the 
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries: "Take the whole 
power without the bourgeoisie, for you have a majority in the 
Soviets." (At the First All-Russian Congress of Soviets, in 
June* 1917, the Bolsheviks had only 13 per cent, of the votes.) 
But the Russian Hendersons and Snowdens feared to take the 
power without the bourgeoisie. Consequently, when the lat- 
*^ ter kept delaying the elections to the Constituent Assembly 



86 

(knowing full well that the majority of votes would go to the 
Social Revolutionaries and the Mehsheviks, which parties 
were in the closest political bloc and represented in fact one 
petit-bourgeois democracy), they (the Socialist Revolution- 
aries and Mensheviks) were powerless to fight energetically 
against these delays.* 

Should the Hendersons and Snowdens refuse to form a bloc 
with the Communists, the latter would have at once gained 
in the work of obtaining the sympathies of the masses and of 
discrediting the Hendersons and Snowdens; and if, on that 
account, the Communists should lose a few seats in Parlia- 
ment, it would not matter very much to them. We would put 
forward our candidates only in very insignificant numbers, 
and only in absolutely safe districts, i. e., where our candidate 
would not help to elect a Liberal against a Laborite. We 
would carry on an election campaign, spreading literature in 
favor of Communism, and proposing in all districts where we 
have no candidates to vote for the Laborite against the bour- 
geois. Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst and Gallaeher are mistaken 
if they think there is treason to Communism in this, or that 
it signifies the renunciation of the fight against social traitors. 
On the contrary, the cause of the Communist revolution could 
undoubtedly only gain by this. 

At present it is often difficult for the British Communists 
even to approach the masses, even to make themselves heard. 
But if I address the masses as a Communist, and invite them 
to vote for Henderson against Lloyd George, I most cer- 
tainly will be hstened to. And, being listened to, I shall be 
able to popularize the idea, not only that Soviets are better 
than Parliaments, and that the dictatorship of the proletariat 
is better than the dictatorship of Churchill (disguised und^r 
the name of bourgeois "democracy''), but also that I am 
prepared to support Henderson by my vote in just the same 
way as a rope supports the man who has hanged himself. 



♦ The elections to the Constituent Assembly in Russia in Novem- 
ber, 1917, on a poll comprising more than thirty-six million electors, 
gave 25 per cent, of the votes to the Bolsheviks. 13 per cent, to the 
various parties of landlords and bourgeoisie, and 62 per cent, to 
petit-bourgeois democracy^i.e., to Socialist RevolutionaHes and Men- 
sheviks, together with small kindred groups. 



87 

And, as the Hendersons draw nearer to the formation of their 
own government, it will be proved that I am right, it will 
draw the masses to my side, and will facilitate the political 
death of the Hendersons and Snowdens, as happened in the 
case of their co-thinkers in Russia and in Germany. 

And if the objection be raised : "These are too cunning and 
intricate tactics; the masses won't understand them; they 
scatter and disintegrate our forces; they will interfere with 
concentration on the Soviet revolution, etc. ;'' I shall reply to 
the "Left" critics : "Don't attribute your doctrinairism to the 
masses !" It is a matter of fact that the masses in Russia are 
not more but less advanced tlian in England ; nevertheless, the 
masses did understand the Bolsheviks, and the latter were 
helped, not hindered, by the circumstances that, on the eve of 
the Soviet Revolution, in September, 1917, lists of their can- 
didates for the bourgeois parliament (Constituent Assembly) 
were being prepared, and that on the morrow of the Soviet 
Revolution, in November, 1917, they were taking part in 
elections to the very same Constituent Assembly which, on 
January 5, 1918,. was dispersed by them. 

I ^cannot dwell here on the second pofht at issue between the 
British Communists ; that is, the question of affiliation or non- 
affiliation to the Labor Party. I have too little information 
on this' question, which is especially complicated on account 
of the quite unique composition of the British Labor Party, 
which is so very unlike the composition of the usual political 
parties on the Continent. • 

I have no doubt, however, that, on this question as well, he 
would be mistaken who would be inclined to draw up the 
tactics of the revolutionary proletariat on the principle that 
"the Communist Party must maintain its doctrine pure and 
its freedom from reformism inviolate; its slogan must be to 
go forward without stopping or turning aside, to follow the 
straight road to the Communist revolution." For such prin- 
ciples only repeat the mistakes of the French Communard- 
Blanquists who, in the year 1874, proclaimed the "repudiation" 
of all compromises and of all intermediary positions. Sec- 
ondly, it is beyond question that the problem, here as every- 



88 

where, consists in the ability to apply the general and funda* 
mental principles of Communism to the specific relations be- 
tween classes and parties, to the specific conditions in the 
• objective development towards Communism — conditions which 
are peculiar to every separate country, and which one must 
be able to study, understand, and point out. 

But of this we shall have to speak not only in connection 
with British Communism, but in connection with the general 
conclusions pertaining to the development of Communism in 
all capitalist countries. These we shall now take up. 



CHAPTER X. 

SOME CONCLUSIONS. 

The Russian bourgeois revolution of 1905 stands out in 
one respect as a unique turning-point in the world's history. 
In one of the most backward capitalist countries, a strike 
movement developed which was unprecedented for its extent 
and strength. During the first month of 1905, the number of 
strikers was ten times the average yearly number for the pre- 
vious ten years (1895-1904) and, from January to October, 
1905, strikes grew continuously and in tremendous dimen- 
sions. Backward Russia, under the influence of a great many 
quite peculiar historical conditions, was the first to show to 
the world, not only the wave-like growth of the activity of the 
oppressed masses during the revolution — a feature common to 
all great revolutions — but also the importance of the prole- 
tariat, infinitely greater than its hiunerical position in the 
population. It showed the world the blending of the economic 
and political strikes, the latter transforming itself into armed 
insurrection; it showed the birth of a new form of mass 
action and mass organization of the classes oppressed by cap- 
italism — i. e., the Soviets. 

The February and October revolutions of 1917 brought the 
Soviets to complete development on a national scale, and sub- 
sequently to their victory in the proletarian Socialist revolu- 
tion. And, less than two years after, the international char- 
acter of the Soviets revealed itself in the spread of this form 
of organization over the world-wide struggle of the working 
class. It became apparent that the historical mission of the 
Soviets was to be the grave-digger, the heir and the successor 
of the bourgeois parliamentarism, and bourgeois democracy 
generally. 

Furthermore, the history of the working-class movement 



90 

now shows that in all countries it must experience (and has 
already begun to experience) a struggle before it grows and 
strengthens towards the victory of Communisnt. The struggle 
is, first and foremo'st, with the opportunism and social- 
chauvinism of the "Menshevik" element in its particular 
country; secondly, the struggle is, in some sort, with "Left" 
Communism. The first stage of this struggle has developed 
itself in all countries, without, it seems, a single exception, 
as the fight between the Second (now practically killed) and 
Third Internationals. The second stage of the struggle can 
be observed in Germany, in England, in Italy and in America 
(at least a certain part of the Industrial Workers of the 
World and the anarcho-syndicalist elements in America de- 
fend the errors of "Left" Communism side by side with an 
almost general, almost unconditional acceptance of the Soviet 
system). This phase of the struggle can also be observed in 
France, where the hostile attitude of a part of the former 
Syndicalists towards the political party and parliamentary- 
action exists side by side with the recognition of the Soviets. 
This similarity makes the struggle against "Left" Communism 
not only international but also world-wide in its scope. 

But, while it everywhere goes through substantially the 
same training school for victory over the bourgeoisie, the 
Labor movement of each country effects this development after 
its own manner. The big advanced capitalist countries pro- 
gress along the road much more rapidly than did the Bolshe- 
viks, who were granted by history a period of fifteen years 
to prepare for victory as an organized political force. The 
Third International, within the short space of one year, has 
already scored a decisive victory, has defeated the yellow, 
social-chauvinist Second International. Only a few months 
ago the latter was incomparably stronger than the Third; it 
appeared stable and potent ; it enjoyed support from all sides, 
direct material assistance (Ministerial posts, passports, the 
Press) as well as the moral support of the bourgeoisie all 
over the world. To-day it is dying. 

The main thing now is that the Communists of each country 
should, in full consciousness, study both the fundamental prob- 
lems of the struggle with opportunism and "Left" doctrinair- 



91 

ism, and the specific peculiarities which this struggle inevitably 
assumes in each separate country, according to the idiosyn- 
crasies of its politics, economics, culture, national compositions 
{e.Qy Ireland), its colonies, religious divisions, etc. Every- 
where is felt an ever-widening and increasing dissatisfaction 
with the Second International, a dissatisfaction due to its op- 
portunism and its incapacity to create a real leading center, 
able to direct the international tactics of the revolutionary pro- 
letariat in the struggle for the world Soviet Republic. One 
must clearly realize that such a leading center can, under no 
circumstances, be built after a single model, by a mechanical 
adjustment and equalization of the tactical rules of the strug- 
gle. The national and State differences, now existing between 
peoples and countries, will continue to exist for a very long 
time, even after the realization of the proletarian dictatorship 
on a world scale. Unity of international tactics in the Com- 
munist Labor movement everywhere demands, not the elim- 
ination of variety, not the abolition of the national peculiarities 
(this at the present moment is a foolish dream), but such an 
application of the fundamental principles of Communism — 
Soviet power and the Dictatorship of the Proletariat — as will 
admit of the right modification of these principles, in their 
adaptation and application *to national and national- State dif- 
ferences. The principal problem of the historical moment in 
which all advanced (and not only the advanced) countries now 
find themselves lies here; that specific national peculiarities 
must be studied, ascertained, and grasped before concrete 
attempts are made in any country to solve the aspects of the 
single international problem, to overcome opportunism and 
Left doctrinairism within the working-class movement, to 
overthrow the bourgeoisie, and to institute a Soviet Republic 
and proletarian dictatorship 

The main thing — although far from everything — has already 
been achieved in winning over the vanguard of the working 
class, in winning it over to the side of Soviet power against 
parliamentarism, to the side of proletarian dictatorship against 
bourgeois democracy. Now all efforts, all attention, must be 
concentrated on the next step, which seems, and from a cer- 
tain standpoint really is, less fundamental, but which is, in 



92 

fact, much nearer to a practical solution of the proletarian 
revolution. That step is to discover the forms of approach or 
transition to the proletarian revolution. 

The proletarian vanguard has been won over to our ideas. 
That is the main thing. Without this, not even the first step 
to victory can be taken, but victory is still distant. With the 
vanguard alone, victory is impossible. It would be not only 
foolish, but criminal, to throw the vanguard into the final 
struggle so long as the whole class, the general mass, has not 
taken up a position either of direct support of the vanguard 
or at least of benevolent neutrality toward it, so long as all 
probability of its supporting the enemy is not past. And, in 
order that really the whole class, the general mass, of toilers 
oppressed by capitalism may come to such a position, propa- 
ganda and agitation alone are not sufficient. For this, the 
masses must have their own political experience. Such is the 
fundamental law of all great revolutions, now confirmed with 
striking force and vividness, not only in Russia, but also in 
Germany. It has been necessary, not only for the backward, 
often illiterate, masses of Russia, but for the highly cultured, 
entirely literate masses of Germany as well, to realize, through 
their own suffering, the impotence and characterlessness, the 
helplessness and servility before the bourgeoisie, the dastardli- 
ness of the government of the knights of the Second Interna- 
tional, the inevitability of a choice between the dictatorship of 
the extreme reactionaries (Komilov in Russia, Kapp and Co. 
in Germany), and the complete dictatorship of the proletariat 
— in order to turn them resolutely towards Communism. 

The problem of the day for a class-conscious vanguard in 
the international labor movement (i.e., for the Communist 
Parties and those groups with Communist tendencies) is to be 
able to bring the general mass — still, in the majority of cases, 
slumbering, apathetic, hidebound and ignorant — ^to their new 
position ; it is to be able to lead, not only their own party, but 
also the masses, during the transitional period. Some feel that 
the first problem — that of gaining the conscious vanguard of 
the working-class to the side of Soviet power and proletarian 
dictatorship — is impossible to solve without a complete ideo- 
logical and political victory over opportunism <wid social* 



^ 



93 

chauvinism. If this is so, the second problem — that of bring- 
ing the masses otrer to their new position, which alone can 
assure the victory of the vanguard in the revolution — cannot 
be solved without liquidation of Left doctrinairism, without 
completely overcoming and getting rid of i):s mistakes. 

So long as the question was, and still is, one of gaining the 
vanguard of the proletariat for Communism, just so long and 
so far will propaganda take the first place; even sec- 
tarian circles, with all the imperfections of sectarianism, 
here give useful and truthful results. But when the question 
IS one of the practical activities of the masses, of the disposi- 
tion — if it be permissable to use this expression — of armies 
numbering millions and of the distribution of all the class forces 
of a given society, for the last and decisive fight, here propa- 
ganda alone, the mere repetition of the truths of "pure" Com- 
munism, will avail nothing. Here one must count by millions 
and tens of millions, not by thousands, as, after all, the propa- 
ganda does, the member of a small group that never yet led the 
masses. Here one must ask oneself, not only whether the van- 
guard of the revolutionary class has been convinced, but also 
whether the historically active forces of all classes of a given 
society have been properly distributed, so that the final battle 
may not be premature. One must make sure, first, that all the 
class forces hostile to us have fallen into complete enough con- 
fusion, are sufficiently at loggerheads with each other, have 
sufficiently weakened themselves in a struggle beyond their 
capacities, to give us a chance of victory ; secondly, one must 
ensure that all the vacillating, wavering, unstable, intermediate 
elements — the petit bourgeoisie and the petit-bourgeois democ- 
racy, in contradistinction to the bourgeoisie — ^have sufficiently 
exposed themselves in the eyes of the people, and have dis- 
graced themselves through their material bankruptcy ; thirdly, 
one must have the feeling of the masses in favor of suppo4;jting 
the most determined, unselfishly resolute, revolutionary action 
against the bourgeoisie. 

Then, indeed, revolution is ripe; then, indeed, if we have 
correctly gauged all the conditions briefly outlined above, and 
if we have chosen the moment rightly, our victory is assured. 

The differences between the Churchills and Lloyd Georges 



9t 

(these political types exist in all countries, allowing for trifling 
national variations) and between the Hendersons and Lloyd 
Georges are quite unimportant and shallow from the viewpoint 
of pure — i.e., of abstract Communism, that is, of Communism ' 
which has not yet ripened into practical mass political activity. 
But from the viewpoint of the practical activity of the masses, 
these differences are exceedingly important. The Communist 
who wishes to be not only a class-conscious convinced propa- 
gandist, but a practical leader of the masses in the revolution, 
must carefully estimate these differences, and determine the 
moment of the complete maturity of the conflicts which in- 
evitably weaken and debilitate all these "friends"; herein lies 
his whole work, his whole problem. It is necessary to co- 
ordinate the strictest devotion to the ideas of Communism with 
the ability to accept all necessary practical compromises, 
manoeuvring, temporizings, zig-zags, retreats and the like. This 
co-ordination is essential in order to hasten the rise and fall, 
the realization and the withering away, of the political power 
of the Hendersons (the heroes of the Second International, to 
mention no names, the representatives of the petit bourgeois 
democracy who call themselves Socialists) ; it is essential in 
order to facilitate their inevitable practical bankruptcy, which 
enlightens the masses precisely after our ideas, precisely in the 
direction of Communism. One must precipitate the inevitable 
quarrel and conflicts between the Hendersons, Lloyd Georges 
and Churchills (Mensheviks, Socialist Revolutionaries, Cadets 
and Monarchists; Scheid.emanns, bourgeoisie, and Kapps, etc.) 
and choose correctly the moment of the maximum disintegra- 
tion between all these "buttresses of sacred, private property," 
in order to defeat them all in one decisive offensive of the pro- 
letariat, and conquer political power. 

History in general, the history of revolutions in |«ui:icular, 
has always been richer, more varied and variform, more vital 
and "cunning" than is conceived of by the best parties, by the 
most conscious vanguards of the most advanced classes! This 
is natural, for the best vanguards express the consciousness, 
will, passions and fancies of but tens of thousands, whereas 
the revolution is effected at the moment of the exceptional 
uplift and exertion of all the human faculties— consciousness, 



95 

will, passion, phantasy — of tens of millions, spurred on by the 
bitterest class war. From this there follow two very impor- 
tant practical conclusions ; first, the revolutionary class, for the 
realization of its object, must be able to master all forms or 
aspects of social activity, without the slightest exception (com- 
pleting, after the conquest of political power, sometimes with 
great risk and tremendous danger, what had been left undone 
before this conquest) ; secondly, that the revolutionary classes 
must be ready for the most rapid and unexpected substitution 
of one form for another. 

Everyone will agree that the behavior of that army which 
does not prepare to master all types of weapons, all means and 
methods of warfare which the enemy may possess, is unwise 
and even criminal; but this applies even more to politics than 
to armies. In politics it is still less possible to foresee which 
means of struggle, under the varying future circumstances, 
will prove applicable and useful to us. If we do not possess 
all the means of struggle, we may suffer a heavy — at times 
even a decisive — defeat, if the changes in the situation of other 
classes which are beyond our control should make the order 
the day that form of activity in which we are especially weak. 
Possessing all the means of struggle, we surely conquer, once 
we represent the interests of the truly foremost, truly revolu- 
tionary class, even though circumstances may not permit us to ' 
use all the weapons most dangerous to our enemy, weapons, 
which the more quickly deal him deadly blows. 

Inexperienced revolutionaries often think that legal means 
of struggle are opportunist, for the bourgeoisie often (espe- 
cially in "peaceful" non-revolutionary times) use such legal . 
means to deceive and fool the workers. On the other hand 
they think that illegal means in the struggle are revolutionary. 
This is not true. What is true is^that the opportunists and 
traitors of the working class are those parties and leaders who 
are unable, or who do not want ("Don't say *I can't,* say *I 
won't' ") to apply illegal means to the struggle. Take, for ex- 
ample, such conditions as prevailed during the imperialist war 
of^ 1914-1918, when the bourgeoisie of the freest democratic 
coimtries deceived the workers with an .outrageous insolence 



and cruelty, prohibiting the truth as to the marauding charac- 
ter of the war to be spoken. 

But those who i:annot co-ordinate ill^al forms of the 
struggle with l^al ones are very poor revolutionaries. It is 
not at all difficult to be a good revolutionary once the revolu- 
tion has already broken out — when all and everyone joins the 
revolution from mere enthusiasm, because it is the fashion, 
sometimes even from considerations of personal gain. It costa 
the proletariat labor, great labor and I may say excruciating 
pains, to rid itself after the victory of these pseudo-revolution- 
ists. But it is far more difficult, and yet more valuable, to know 
how to be a revolutionary, even when conditions are yet ladc- 
ing for direct, general, truly mass, and truly revolutionary 
action ; to be able to defend the interests of the revolution by 
propaganda, agitation and organization, in non-revolutionary 
institutions and often times in downright reactionary sur- 
roundings, amongst masses that are incapable of immediately 
understanding the necessity for revolutionary methods. To be 
able to find, to sense, to determine the concrete plan of still 
incomplete revolutionary methods and measures, leading the 
masses to the real, decisive, final, great revolutionary struggle — 
this is the chief problem of modem Communism in Western 
Europe and America. 

Take, for example, Britain. We cannot know, and no one 
is capable of predicting truly, how soon a real proletarian revo- 
lution will break out there, and what, more than any other, will 
be the cause which will awaken and inflame the now slumber- 
ing masses to revolution. It is therefore incumbent upon us 
to carry on our preparatory work so as to be "shod on all four 
feet," as the late Plekhanoff was wont to say, when he was yet 
a Marxist and a revolutionist. Possibly it will be a parlia- 
mentary crisis which will "break the ice" ; possibly it will be a 
crisis resulting from the Tibpelessly confused colonial and im- 
perialist antagonisms, which become more and more painful 
and acute from day to day ; possibly from some quite unseen 
third cause. We are not speaking of which struggle will decide 
the fate of the proletarian revolution in England — ^this ques- 
tion does not rouse any doubts in the minds of Communists, 
this question for all of us is decided and decided finally — we 



1 

1 



97 

are speaking of what will induce the now slumbering prole- 
tarian masses to move towards and directly approach the 
revolution. Let us not forget how in the French bourgeois 
revolution, in a situation which, from the international and 
domestic aspect, was a hundred times less revolutionary than 
at present, such an unexpected and petty cause as one among, 
thousands of dishonest tricks of the reactionary military caste 
(the Dreyfus case) was enough to bring the people face to 
face with civil war. 

The Communists in Britain must continuously, assiduously 
and determinedly utilize both the parliamentary elections and 
every opening offered by the Irish, colonial and world- 
imperialist policy of the British Government, and all other 
aspects, domains and spheres of public life, working every- 
where in the new Communist spirit, the spirit not of the 
Second, but of the Third International. Neither time nor 
space permits me to describe here the manner of the Russian 
Bolshevik participation in the parliamentary elections and 
struggle; but I can assure the Communists abroad Jthat it was 
not at all like the usual West European parliamentary cam- 
paign. From this the conclusion is often drawn "Oh, well, our. 
parliamentarism is different from yours in Russia." This is 
the wrong conclusion. Communists, adherents to the Third 
International, exist in all countries precisely for the purpose 
of adapting, along the whole line, in every domain of life, the 
old Socialist, Trade Unionist, Syndicalist and parliamentarian 
activities to the new Communist idea. We, too, had plenty of 
opportunism, pure bourgeois traffickings, rascally capitalist 
dealings in our elections. The Communists of Western 
Europe and America must learn to create a new parliamen- 
tarism, entirely distinct from the usual opportunist, office- 
seeking form. This new parliamentarism must be used by the 
Communist Party to set forth its program; it must be used 
by the real proletariat, who, in co-operation with the unorgan- 
ized and very much ignored poor, should go from house to 
house of the workers, from hut to hut of tfce agricultural pro- 
letariat and isolated peasantry, carrying and distributing 
leaflets. (Fortunately, in Europe there are fewer isolated 
peasants than in Russia, and fewer still in England ) The 



98 

Communist should penetrate into the humblest taverns, should 
find his way into the unions, societies, and chance gatherings 
of the common people and talk with them, not learnedly, nor 
too much after the parliamentary fashion. He should not for 
a moment think of a "place" in parliament; his only object 
should be everywhere to awaken the minds of the people, to 
attract the masses, to trip the bourgeoisie up on their own 
words, utilizing the apparatus created by them, the election 
contests arranged by them, the appeals to the whole people 
issued by them, to preach Bolshevism to the masses. Under 
the rule of the bourgeoisie this is possible only during an elec- 
tion campaign — not counting, of course, the occasion of great 
strikes, when a similar apparatus of general agitation may be 
utilized, as we utilized it, still more intensely. It is exceed- 
ingly difficult to do this in Western Europe and America, but 
it can and must be done, for without labor the problems of 
Communism can in no way be solved. It is necessary to work 
for the solution of all practical problems which are becoming 
more and more varied, more and more involved with all 
branches of public life, as the Communists tend to conquer 
one field after another from the bourgeoisie. 

Likewise in Britain it is necessary to put the work of propa- 
ganda, of agitation and organization in the army, and among 
the nationalities oppressed and deprived of equal rights in 
"their" ^mpire (e.g., Ireland, Egypt, etc.), on a new basis. 
This work must be carried on not on Socialist but on Com- 
, munist lines, not in the reformist but in the revolutionary 
* manner. For all these spheres of public life are especially 
filled with inflammable material and create many causes for 
conflicts, crises, enhancements of the class struggle. This is 
especially true in the epoch of imperialism gcj^rally, and par- 
ticularly now when war has exhausted the peoples and has 
opened their eyes to the truth — namely, that tens of millions 
have been killed and maimed solely to decide whether English 
or German plunderers should rob more countries. We do not 
know, and we cannot know, which of the inflammable sparks 
which now fly in all countries, fanned by the economic and 
political world crisis, will be the one to start the conflagration 
(in the sense of a particular awakening of the masses) ; wc 



99 

are, therefore, bound to utilize our new Communist principles 
in the cultivation of all and every field of endeavor, no matter 
how old, rotten and seemingly hopeless. Otherwise we shall 
not be equal to the occasion, shall not be comprehensive, shall 
not be prepared to master all the types of weapons in the 
struggle, shall not be ready for victory over the bourgeoisie — 
which is responsible for the creation of all the aspects of public 
life, but which has now disrupted them, and disrupted them in 
a purely bourgeois manner. Not without careful preparation 
shall we be ready for the impending Communist reorganization 
of society after our victory. 

After the proletarian revolution in Russia and the victories 
(so unexpected for the bourgeoisie and all philistines) on an 
international scale of this revolution, the whole world has be- 
come different. The bourgeoisie, too, has changed. The 
bourgeoisie is scared and enraged by "Bolshevism," and has 
been driven almost to the point of madness. On the one hand 
it hastens the development of events, and on the other it con- 
centrates its attention on the forcible suppression of Bol- 
shevism, thus weakening its position in a great many other 
fields. The Communists of all advanced countries must reckon 
with both these circumstances in their tactics. 

When the Russian Cadets (Constitutional Democrats) and 
Kerensky raised a hue-and-cry against the Bolsheviks (espe- 
cially after April, 1917, and particularly in June-July, 1917), 
they rather "overdid it." Millions of copies of bourgeois 
papers, which were raising all sorts of howls against the Bol- 
sheviks, helped to draw the masses into a study of Bolshevism ; 
and, apart from the newspapers, the whole public, precisely 
because of the zeal of the bourgeoisie, was taken up with dis- 
cussions about Bolshevism. At present, the millionaires of all 
countries are behaving, on an international scale, in such a 
manner as to deserve our heartiest thanks. They are hunting 
Bolshevism with the same zeal as did Kerensky and Co. ; they 
are "overdoing it," and helping us quite as much as did Ker- 
ensky. When the French bourgeoisie makes Bolshevism the 
central point of the election campaign, scolding as Bolsheviks 
the comparatively moderate and vacillating Socialists; when 
the American bourgeoisie, having completely lost^ its head. 



r 



100 

sdzes thousands and thousands of people upon suspicion of 
Bolshevism, and creates an atmosphere of panic, spreading 
alarms of Bolshevik plots broadcast; when the English bour- 
geoisie (the "sedatest" in the world), in spite of all its wis- 
dom and experience, commits acts of incredible stupidity, 
forms the richest "Counter-Bolshevik" societies, creates a 
special literature on the subject, and hires for the struggle 
against it a large niunber of scientists, priests and agitators — 
we must then bow and thank these worthy capitalists. They 
work for us. They help us to get the masses interested in the 
question of the nature and significance of Bolshevism. And 
they cannot act otherwise; for to "pass over" Bolshevism in 
silence, to stifle it — ^in this they have already failed. 

But at the same time the bourgeoisie sees in Bolshevism only 
one side — insurrection, violence, terror ; it endeavors therefore 
to prepare itself especially for resistance and opposition in that 
direction alone. It is possible that in single cases, in individual 
countries, and for more or less short periods, it will succeed. 
We must reckon with such a possibility, and there is abso- 
lutely nothing dreadful to us in the fact that the bourgeoisie 
might have temporary success in this. Communism ^'springs • 
up" from positively all sides of social life. Its sptouts are 
everywhere; the "contagion," to use the favorite and pleasant 
metaphor of the bourgeoisie and the bourgeois police, has very 
thoroughly penetrated the organism and totally impr^nated 
it. If one of the outlets were to be stopped up with special 
care, the "contagion" would find another, sometimes a most 
unexpected, outlet. Life will assert itself. Leave the bour- 
geoisie to rage, let it w ork it self into a frenzy,' c ommit stupidi- 
ties, take vengeance in advance oiT the BoIsEeviks, and en- 
deavor to exterminate (in India, Hungary, "Germany, etc.) 
more hundreds, thousands, and hundreds of thousands of the 
Bolsheviks of yesterday and tomorrow. Acting thus, the 
bourgeoisie acts as did all classes condemned to death by his-; 
tory. Communists know that the future at any rate is theirs ; 
therefore,- we can, and must, unite the intensest passion in the 
great revolutionary struggle with the coolest and soberest ap- 
preciation of the mad ravings of the bourgeoisie. The Rus- 
sian revolution was defeated heavily in 1905 ; the Russian Bpl- 



101 

sheviks were beaten in July, 1917; over 15,000 German 
Communists were killed by means of the clever provocation 
and the artful maneuvers of Scheidemann and Noske, work- 
ing with the bourgeoisie and monarchist generals; White 
Terror is raging in Finland and Hungary. But in all cases and 
in all countries Communism grows and is hardened ; its roots 
are so deep that persecution neither weakens nor debilitates, 
but rather strengthens it. Only one thing more is needed to 
lead us surely and firmly to victory, namely, the consciousness 
everywhere that all Communists, in all countries, must display 
a maximum flexibility in their tactics. The only thing want- 
ing to Communism, which is splendidly advancing, especially 
in the advanced countries, is this consciousness and the skill 
of applying it in practice. 

That which has happened to Kautsky, Otto Bauer and others, 
highly erudite Marxists,, devoted to Socialism, and leaders of 
the Second International, could and ought to serve as a useful 
lesson. They fully appreciated the necessity of pliable tactics, 
they learned and taught to others the Marxist dialectics — ^and 
much of what they have done in that respect will remain for 
ever a valuable acquisition to Socialist literature. But in the 
application of these dialectics they made a great mistake ; they 
showed themsAves in practice to be so wndialectic, and so in- 
capable of reckoning with the rapid changes of forms and the 
rapid filling of old ^orms with new contents, that their fate is 
not much more enviable than that of Hyndman, Guesde and 
Plekhanoff. The main reason for their bankruptcy was that 
their eyes were "fastened" upon one fixed form of the growth 
of the working-class movement and of Socialism. They forgot 
all about its one-sidedness, and were afraid to perceive the 
sharp break which, by virtue of objective conditions, became 
unavoidable; so they continue to repeat the simple, at first 
glance self-evident truth, once learned by rote; "Three are 
more than two." But politics resembles algebra more than 
arithmetic, and it is more like higher than lower mathematics. 
In reality all the old forms of the Socialist movement have 
been filled with new contents ; there appears before the figures, 
consequently, a new sign, a "minus" ; and our wiseacres stub- 
bornly continue to persuade themselves and others that "minus 
three" is more than "minus two !" 



102 

Communists must endeavor not to repeat the same mistake ; 
or, to speak more precisely, the same mistake — committed the 
other way round by the Left Communists — ^must be corrected 
SQpner and more quickly in order to get rid of it with less pain 
to the organism. Not only Right but Left doctrinairism is a 
mistake. Of course the mistake of the latter in Communism 
is at the present moment a thousand times less dangerous and 
less significant than the mistake of Right doctrinairism. (i.e., 
social-chauvinism and Kautskianism) ; but, after all, this is 
due to the fact that Left Communism is quite a young current, 
Just coming into being. For this reason the disease under 
certain conditions can be easily cured, and it is necessary to 
begin its treatment with the utmost energy. 

The old forms have burst ; for the contents (anti-proletarian 
and reactionary) obtained an inordinate development. We 
now have, from the standpoint of the development of inter- 
national Communism, strong, powerful contents at work for 
Soviet power and the proletarian dictatorship, and these can 
and must manifest themselves in any form, new as old; the 
new spirit can and must regenerate, conquer and subjugate all 
forms, not only the new but the old, not for the purpose of 
reconciling the new with the old forms, but to enable us to 
forge all forms, new and old, into a weapon lor the final de- 
cisive and unswerving victory of Communism. 

The Communists must strain every effort to direct the move- 
ment of the working class, and the development of society 
generally, alShg the straightest and quickest way to the univer- 
sal victory of Soviet power and the proletarian dictatorship. 
This truth is incontestable. But it is enough to take one little 
step farther — a step it would seem in the same direction — and 
truth is transformed into error ! It is enough to say, as do the 
German and British "Left" Communists, that we acknowledge 
only one straight road, that we do not admit maneuvers, co- 
operation, compromises — ^and this will already be a mistake, 
which is capable of bringing, and, in fact, has brought and is 
bringing, the most serious harm to Communism. Right doc- 
trinairism has foundered on the recognition of only the old 
forms, and has become totally bankrupt, not having perceived 
the new contents. Left doctrinairism unconditionally re- 



^^^ 



1(» 

pudiates certain old forms, failing to see that the new content 
is breaking its way through all and every form, that it is our 
diity as* Communists to master them all, to learn how to sup- 
plement, with the maximum rapidity, one form by another, alid 
to adapt our tactics to all such changes, caused not by our 
class nor by our endeavors. 

World revolution has been given a powerful impetus by the 
horrors, atrocities and villainies of the world imperialist war, 
and by the hopelessness of the position created by it. This 
revolution is spreading more widely and deeply with such 
supreme rapidity, with such splendid richness of varying forms, 
with such an instructive, practical refutation of all doctrinair- 
ism, that there is every hope of a speedy and thorough recov- 
ery of the international Communist movement from the 
infantile disorder of "Left" Communism. 

April 27, 1920. 






V 










K . \ ' 



* 



\^'^ 



^ 



*' 




^ 



y 



,^' 









V'' • / 



APPENDIX 

While the problem of publishing this brochure was being 
solved in our country — robbed as she was by the imperialists 
of the whole world, who are wreaking vengeance upon her be- 
cause of the proletarian revolution, and who continued to rob 
and blockade her in spite of promises to their own tvorkers — 
there came from abroad additional material. Not pretending 
to make in my brochure more than the general remarks of a 
publicist, I shall only briefly touch upon some points. 



APPENDIX I. 

THE SPUT OF THE GERMAN COMMUNIST PARTY. 

The split of the German Communists has become an ac- 
complished fact. The "Left" or "Opposition in principle" has 
established a separate "Communist Labor Party" in contradis- 
tinction to the "Communist Party." There is evidence that 
Italy is also approaching a similar split. I make this statement 
subject to correction, as I only possess the additional numbers 
— numbers 7 and S- — of the "Left" paper, // Soviet, which 
openly deals with the possibility and the inevitably of a split. 
There are also discussions concerning a forthcoming confer- 
ence of the "Abstentionist" group (in other words, of the 
group of boycottists or opponents of participation in Parlia- 
ment) a group that was, hitherto, part of the Italian Socialist 
Party. 

There is reason to apprehend that the split with the "Left" 
anti-parliamentarians, and partly also with the anti-politicals 
(who are in opposition to the political parties and Trade Union 
activity), will become an international phenomenon, similar to 
the split with the "Centrists" (i.e., Kautskians, the Longuetists, 
the Independents, and so forth.) Be it so. A split is, at all 
events, preferable to a muddle, which is a hindrance both to 
ideological, theoretical and revolutionary growth; a hindrance 
to the maturing of t{ie party and to its organized work of prac- 
tical preparation for the dictatorship of the proletariat. 

Let the "Left" make an attempt to prepare (and then to 
realize) on a national and international scale, the dictatorship 
of the proletariat ; let them attempt to do this without a strictly 
centralized, disciplined, party, capable of leading and managing 
every branch, every sphere, every variety of political and 
cultural work. Practical experience will soon make them 
wiser. 



106 t 

Every eflfort must be made in order that the split with the 
"Left" shall impede or hinder as little as possible the amalga- 
mation into one common party — ^inevitable in the near future — 
of all participators in the Labor Movement who are sincerely 
and whole-heartedly in favor of the Soviet system and prole- 
tarian dictatorship. It was a peculiar stroke of luck for the 
Russian Bolsheviks that they had fifteen years of systematic 
and decisive fighting, "^oth against the Mensheviks (that is to 
say, the opportunists and "Centrists") as well as against the 
"Left," long before the direct mass struggle for; proletarian 
dictatorship. The same work has to be performed now in ^ 
Europe and in America by means of "forced marches." It 
may happen that individual personalities, especially those be- 
longing to the category of unsuccessful pretenders to leader- 
ship, will, through the lack of proletarian discipline and "in- 
tellectual honesty," adhere for a long time to their mistakes. 
As far as the working masses are concerned, when the moment 
arrives they will amalgamate naturally, and unite all sincere 
Communists under a common banner into a common party, 
capable of realizing the Soviet system and the dictatorship of 
the proletariat.* 



* I shall make the following remark with regard to the question of 
the future amalgamation of the "Left" Communists (anti-parliamen- 
tarians) and Communists generally. As far as I can judge by the 
acquaintance I have formed of the newspapers of the "Left," and 
those of the German Communists in general, the first have the ad- 
vantage over the second in that they are better agitators among the 
masses. I have repeatedly observed something analogous in the 
history of the Bolshevik Party — though on a smaller scale, and in 
individual local organizations, never on a national scale. For in- 
stance, in 1907-1908 the "Left" Bolsheviks had, upon certain occasions 
and in many places, better success in propaganda among the masses 
than we had. In a revolutionary moment, or at a time when revo- 
lutionary recollections are still fresh, it is most easy to approach the 
masses with the tactics of mere negation. This, however, can hardly 
serve as an argument for the correctness of such tactics. At all 
events, there is not the least doubt that the Communist Party, which 
actually wishes to be the advance guard of the revolutionary class of 
the proletariat, and which, in addition wishes to lead the general 
masses (not only the wide proletarian masses, but also the non- 
proletarian toilers and exploited), must necessarily be capable of 
propaganda, of organization, and of agitation in the most accessible, 
most comprehensible form; must demonstrate clearly and graphic- 
ally, not only for the town and factory man-in-the-street, but also 
for the whole of the village population. 



APPENDIX II. 

COMMUNISTS AND INDEPENDENTS IN GERMANY. 

In my brochure. I have ventured an opinion to the effect that 
a compromise between the Communists and the "Left" wing 
of the Independents is necessary and useful to Communism, 
but that it will be difficult to effect this. The newspapers which 
I have subsequently received have confirmed both aspects of 
my opinion. A "statement'' of the Central Committee of the 
German Communist Party on the military outburst of Kapp- 
Luttvvitz and on the "Socialist Government" has been pub- 
lished in No. 32 of the Red Banner (Die Rote Fahne, the organ 
of the Communist Party of Germany, March 26, 1920.) From 
the point of view both of basic principle and of practical con- 
clusions, this statement is perfectly correct. Its basic position 
is that an objective basis is lacking at the present moment for 
proletarian dictatorship, in view of the fact that the majority 
of the town workers are in favor of the Independents. The 
conclusion arrived at was: the promise of a "loyal opposition" 
to the Government, that is to say, a repudiation of an armed 
coup d'etat, provided that this be "a Socialist Government ex- 
cluding all capitalist and bourgeois parties." 

Undoubtedly this was correct tactics. But, if it is hardly 
worth while to dwell oil trifling inexactitudes, yet it is difficult 
to pass over in silence such a glaring misunderstanding as the 
one caused by the official statement of the Communist Party ; 
the government of social traitors is called "Socialist"; it is 
hardly possible to speak of "the exclusion of bourgeois-capi- 
talist parties" when the parties of both Scheidemann and 
Messrs. Kautsky-Crispien are petit-bourgcois-democratic ; it 
is hardly permissible to write such things as those contained 
in paragraph 4 of the declaration, which is to the following 
effect : — 



t«6 

In order further to gain the sympatfiy of the proletarian 
masses in favor of Communism, a state of things under 
which political freedom can be fully utilized and under 
wlych bourgeois democracy could in no case manifest itself 
as a dictatorship of capital— such a state of things is of 
great importance from the point of view of the^development 
of proletarian dictatorship 

Such a state of things is an impossibility. Petit bourgeois 
leaders, the German Hendersons and Snowdens (Scheidemann 
and Crispien) cannot possibly abandon bourgeois democracy, 
which in its turn cannot but be a capitalist dictatorship. From 
the point of view of the attainment of practical results, as 
correctly pursued by the Central Committee of the Party, 
there was no necessity at all to write such a statement, incor- 
rect in principle and politically harmful. If one wishes to in- 
dulge in iparliamentary language, it is sufficient to say "So 
long as the majority of the town workers follow the Inde- 
pendents, we Communists cannot possibly interfere with the 
workers in their desire to live out their last illusions of middle 
class democracy (consequently, also bourgeois-capitalist illu- 
sions) in practical experience with their own governments." 
This is sufficient for the justification of the compromise, for 
which there is a real necessity, and which means that, for a 
certain period, all attempts at a violent overthrow of the gov- 
ernment which enjoys the confidence of a majority of the town 
workers must be abandoned. In every-day mass agitation, un- 
connected with any form of officialdom or Parliamentary 
politeness, it is, of course, quite possible to add: "Let such 
knaves and fools as the Scheidemanns and the Kautsky-Cris- 
piens actually reveal the full extent to which they are them- 
selves deceived and to which they deceive the workers; their 
*pure' government will itself make the 'cleanest' possible sweep 
of the Augean stables of Socialism, Social Democracy and all 
other forms of social treason." 

There is no foundation for the statement that the present 
leaders of the German Independent Social-Democratic Party 
have lost all influence ; in reality, they are more dangerous to 
the proletariat than the Hungarian Social Democrats, who 
«tyled themselves Communists and promised to "support" the 



109 

dictatorship of the proletariat. The real nature of tfiese lead- 
ers has asserted itself repeatedly during the German Komilov 
period — i.e., during the Luttwitz-Kapp coup d'etat. The short 
articles of Karl Kautsky serve as a miniature, but vivid, ex- 
ample. These are entitled "Decisive Moments"- and appear in 
the Freiheit, the organ of the Independents (March 30, 1920). 
There is also the article by Arthur Crispien entitled "The 
Political Situation" (ibid April 14, 1920). These men are 
absolutely incapable of thinking and reasoning like revolu- 
tionaries. They are sentimental middle-class democrats, who 
are a thousand times more dangerous to the proletariat when 
they proclaim themselves to be adherents qf the Soviet system 
and of proletarian dictatorship; for, as a matter of course, 
they will, upon every critical and difficult occasion, comtnit aqts 
of treason — "sincerely" confident all the time that they are 
assisting the proletariat ! Is it not a fact that, wheal the Hun- 
garian Social-Democrats quailed and whined before the agents 
of the Entente capitalists and the Entente executioners, they 
claimed that all the time their one desire was to "assist" the 
proletariat? And these were men who had undergone a Com- 
munist baptism, but who, owing' to their cowardice and lack of 
character, considered the position of the Soviet Government 
in Hungary as hopeless. 



APPENDIX III. 

TURATI & CO. IN ITALY. 

The copies of the Italian newspaper // Soviet, referred to 
above, fully confirm all that I have said in my brochure re- 
garding the error of the Italian Socialist Party, which suffers 
in its ranks such members and groups as Parliamentarians. 
It is still better confirmed by a layman, in the person of the 
Rome correspondent of the British bourgeois Liberal news- 
paper, the Manchester Guardian, whose interview with Turati 
is published in that paper on March 12, 1920. 

Signor Turati, writes this correspondent, is of opinion 
that the revolutionary peril is not such as to cause undue 
anxiety in Italy. The Maximalists are fanning the flame of 
Soviet theories only to keep the masses awake and excited. 
These theories are, however, merely legendary notions, un- 
ripe programs, incapable of being put to practical use. 
They are useful only to maintain the working class in a 
state of expectation. The very men who employ them as 
a lure to dazzle proletarian eyes find themselves frequently 
compelled to fight a daily battle for the extortion of some 
trifling economic advantages, so as to delay the moment 
when the working class will lose their illusions and faith 
in their favorite myths. Hence a long string of strikes of 
all sizes and with all pretexts, up to the very latest ones in 
the mail and railway services^ — which make the already 
hard conditions of the country still worse. The country is 
irritated owing to the difficulties connected with its Adriatic 
problem, it is weighed down by its foreign debt and by its 
inflated paper circulation, and yet it is far from realizing 
the necessity of adopting that discipline of work which alone 
can restore order and prosperity. 



V 



^ 



111 

It IS as clear as daylight that the English correspondent has 
let slip the truth — which in all probability is partly concealed 
and improved upon by Turati himself, his bourgeois defenders, 
assistants, and inspirers in ttaly. The truth in question is to 
the effect that the ideas and the political activity of such men 
as Turati, Treves, Modigliani> Dugoni and Co. is actually 
and precisely such as that described by the British corres- 
pondent. It is social-treachery, pure and simple. It is so 
symptomatic, this defence of "order and discipline" for work- 
ers who are wage slaves, for workers who toil to enrich the 
capitalists. And how well we Russians are acquainted with 
all these Menshevik speeches! How valuable this recognition 
that the masses are in favor of the Soviet form of govern- 
ment ! This inability to conceive the revolutionary importance 
of the strike wave, growing irrepressibly, how stupid and how 
meanly middle-class it is ! Yes, yes, the British correspondent 
of the bourgeois Liberal paper has rendered an ill service to 
Messrs. Turati and Co., and has well confirmed the just de- 
mands of Comrade Bordiga and his friends of II Soviet, who 
are insisting that the Italian Socialist Party, if its intention to 
go with the Third International be real, should expel from its 
ranks with all the ignominy they deserve Messrs Turati and 
Co., and should become a Communist Party not only in word 
but in deed. 



APPENDIX IV. 

INCORRECT CONCLUSIONS DRAWN FROM 

CORRECT PREMISES. 

Yet Comrade Bordiga and his "Left" friends draw from 
their correct criticism of Messrs. Turati and Co. the wrong con- 
clusion that Parliamentary participation is harmful generally. 
The Italian "Left" are incapable of bringing forward even a 
shadow of serious argument in support of this view. They 
do not know (or they are trying to forget), the international 
instances of actual revolutionary and Communist utilisation 
of the bourgeois parliament — a utilization which is essential 
for the proletarian revolution. They simply fail to concieve the 
new tactics and, repealing themselves endlessly, they keep up 
the cry regarding the old non-Bolshevik utilization of par- 
liamentarism. 

This is their cardinal mistake. Communism must introduce 
its new method, not only into parliament, but in every sphere 
of activity. The aim of this new method is, whilst retaining 
^nd developing all that is good in the Second International, 
radically to break with the traditions of that International; 
but without long and persistent labor this cannot be effected. 

As an instance, let us take the Press. Newspapers, bro- 
chures, proclamations fulfill a necessary work of piropaganda, 
agitation, and organization. Without a journalistic apparatus, 
no single mass movement can go on in a more or less civilized 
country. And, to carry on the work of the Press, it is abso- 
lutely necessary to employ the services of men from the bour- 
geois-intellectual class. No outcry against leaders, no kind 
of pledge or promise ta preserve the purity of the masses 5 
from their influence, can abolish this necessity, can abolish the 
bourgeois democratic setting and atmosphere of property in 
which this work is being carried on under capitalism. Even 



^ 



113 

g^wo and a half years after the overthrow of the bourgfeoisie 
and the aqquirement of political power by the proletariat, we 
still see around us this atmosphere of mass (peasant and 
craftsmen), bourgeois-democratic, property relations. 

Parliamentarism is one form of activity, journalism is 
another. Both can be Communist and should be communist, 
when the active workers in either sphere are really commun- 
ists, are really members of the proletarian mass party. Yet 
in one as well as in the other (and, for the matter of that, in 
any sphere of activity), under the system of capitalism and 
during the transition period from capitalism to Socialism, it 
is impossible to avoid those difficulties which are inherent in 
their present organization. It is for the proletariat to solve 
the problem of utilizing for its own ends it's assistants, press 
or political, of a bourgeois turn of mind ; of gaining a victory 
over the bourgeois intellectual prejudices and influences; of 
weakening and, ultimately, of completing the transformation 
of the petit-bourgeois atmosphere. 

Have we not all been witnesses of an abundance of instan- 
ces, in all countries prior to the war of 1914-1918, of extreme 
"Left" Anarchists, Syndicalists, and others denouncing par- 
liamentarism, and deriding parliamentary Socialists who be- 
came middle-class, flaying them as place-seekers and so forth, 
and yet themselves making the same kind of bourgeois career 
through the Press and through syndicalist trade union activ- 
ity? To quote only France, are not the examples of Messrs. 
Jouhaux and Merrheim typical enough? 

That is why the "repudiation" of participation in Parlia- 
ment is mere childishness. Those who would boycott Par- 
liament think it possible to "solve," by such a "simple" and 
"easy," alleged revolutionary, method, the difficult problem of 
the struggle j^ainst bourgeois democptic influences within 
the labor movement. In r&lity they are fleeing from their 
own shadow, they are closing their eyes to difficulties, and 
"' satisf)ring themselves with mere words. And there Is no 
doubt whatever that capitalism universally generates, not only 
outside the labor movement, but also within it, certain prc- 
vadling diaracteristic traits^ §uch as shameless place-hunting, 



\ 



\ 



114 * 

a bourgeofs readiness to accept soft jobs in the Government,' 
a glaring reformist corruption in parliamentary activity, des- 
picable middle-class routine. But this capitalist and bour- 
geois atmosphere disappears but slowly even after the over- 
throw of the bourgeoisie (owing to the fact that the latter is 
constantly reborn from the peasantry), and the same at- 
mosphere tends to permeate every sphere of activity and life, 
still reappearing in the form of place-hunting, national chau- 
vinism and middle-classness of outlook and attitude, etc. 

To yourselves, dear boycottists and anti-parliamentarians, 
you seem to be "terribly revolutionary," but in reality you are 
intimidated by comparatively small difficulties in the struggle 
against bourgeois influences within the labor movement, when 
actually your victory — i, e,, the overthrow of the bourgeoisie 
and t)ie conquest of the political power by the proletariat, will 
create these very difficulties on an infinitely larger scale. Like 
children, you have become frightened of a difficulty which 
confronts you to-day, failing to understand that, to-morrow 
and the day after, you will have to learn to overcome the same 
kind of difficulties, but on a far larger scale. 

Under the Soviet form of government, both our and your 
parties are invaded by an ever-growing number of bourgeois 
intellectuals. They will find their way into the Soviets, and 
into the courts of law, and into every sphere of administration, 
as it is impossible to build up Communism otherwise than out 
of the human material created by capitalism. Since it is im- 
possible to expel and to destroy the bourgeois intelligentsia, 
it becomes indispensable to conquer this intelligentsia, to 
change, to re-train and to re-educate it, just as it is necessary 
to re-educate, in the process of a long struggle, the proletariat 
itself, on the basis of proletarian dictatorship. The proletariat 
cannot abolish its own petit-bourgeois prejudices at one mira- 
culous stroke ; this can be accomplished neither by the com- 
mand of the Virgin Mary, nor by any slogan, resolution, or 
decree, but only by dint * of a long and difficult mass struggle 
against petit-bourgeois influence. The same problems which 
at the present tin\e the anti-parliamentarians brush aside with 
one hand so proudly, so loftily, so lightly, so childishly, will, 
under the Soviet system of government, ari^c within the very 



» 1 



115 

^ Soviets themselves, within the Soviet administration, with the 
Soviet "legal defenders." We have done well to abolish in 
Russia the bourge^s law fraternity, but it is reviving here 
under the cover of Soviet "legal defenders." In the case of 
the Soviet engineers, the Soviet teachers, and the privileged 
(i. e,, the better skilled and better paid) working men at the 
Soviet factories, we observe a constant revival of absolutely 
all the negative traits peculiar to the bourgeois parliamentar- 
ism. It is only by dint of constant, untiring, long and stub- 
born struggle of proletarian organization and discipline that 
we can gradually conquer this evil. 

True enough, under bourgeois domination it is most "diffi- 
cult" to conquer bourgeois habits in one's own party — t. e,, 
the labor party; it is "difficult" to expel from the party the 
accustomed parliamentary leaders who are hopelessly corrupt 
with bourgeois prejudices; it is "difficult" to subject the ab- 
solutely necessary, even if limited, number, of bourgeois intel- 
lectuals to proletarian discipline; it is "difficult" to form, in 
the bourgeois parliament, a Communist Group worthy of the 
working class; it is "difficult" to ensure that the Communist 
parliamentarians do not engage in the bourgeois parliamentary 
game of wire-pulling, but take up the necessary and actual 
work of agitation, propaganda and organization of the masses. 
All this is most "difficult," there is no doubt about it; it was 
a difficult thing in Russia, and it is a still more difficult thing 
in Western Europe and in America, where the bourgeoisie is 
far stronger, and where bourgeois democratic traditions, and 
so forth, are more hide-bound. 

"Yet all these "difficulties" are playthings in comparison 
with the same kind of problems with which the proletarians 
will inevitably be confronted just the same, and which it will 
be obliged to solve for the sake of its victory, both during the 
revoluno|i ^and after the conquest of power by the proletariat. 
During the period of proletarian dictatorship it will become 
, accessary to re-educate millions. of peasants and small-owners 
of property ; hundreds of thousands of employees, of officials, 
and of bourgeois intellectuals; it will become necessary t©^ 
Object them all to the proletarian State and to proletarian 
leadership, to suppress and conquer in them their bourgeois 






^ v^ 



116 

habits and traditions. In comparison with these trtdy gigan-4^ 
tic problems, it becomes a childishly easf matter to establish, 
nnder the bourgeois dictatorship and in the bourgeois parlia- 
ment, a real Communist Group of a real proletarian party. 

If our "Left" comrades and anti-parliamentarians fail now 
to learn to overcome even such small diflficulties, we man as- 
sert with confidence that they will prove incapable of realizing 
proletarian dictatorship, of dealing on a large scale with the 
problem of changing the bourgeois intellectuals and the bour- 
geois institutions. Alternatively, they will have to complete 
their education in a hurry; and this haste will render great 
harm to the cause of the proletariat, and will cause it to com- 
mit more errors than usual; and to manifest more weakness 
and inefficiency than usual. 

So long as the bourgeoisie is not overthrown, and, subse- 
quently, until small economy and small production have utterly 
disappeared — ^the bourgeois atmosphere, proprietary habits, 
middle-class traditions, will impair the proletarian work from 
without as well as from within the labor movement ; not only 
in the one sphere of parliamentary activity, but unavoidably in 
each and every sphere of social activity, in each and every 
branch of politics, culture and life, this bourgeois atmosphere 
will manifest itself. The attempt to brush aside, to do away 
with, one of the "unpleasant" problems or difficulties in one 
field of activity, is a profound mistake and one which will 
have to be paid for dearly. It is necessary to learn and to 
master every sphere of activity and work without exception, 
to overcome all difficulties and all bourgeois habits, customs, 
and traditions. To put the question in any other form is^ 
refuse to treat it seriously, and is mere childishness. ^^^sjf 

May 12, 1920. ^ ^^^Jv 






•Wm. 



117 

APPENDIX V. 

In the Russian text of this book, I in some degree mis- 
represented the conduct of the Dutch Communist Party, as a 
whole, in international revolutionary politics. I therefore take 
this opportunity to publish the letter, given below, of the 
Dutch comrades on this point, and, further, to correct the 
expression "Dutch Tribunists," which I used in the Russian 
version, and to substitute for it "some member of the Dutch 
Communist Party." 

N. Lenin. 



A Letter from Wijnkoop. 

Moscow, 

June 30, 1920. 

Dear Comrade Lenin, — 

Thanks to your kindhess we, the members of the Dutch 
Delegation to the Second Congress of the Communist Inter- 
national, could look oyer your book, ''Left Wing'* Commun- 
ism: An Infantile Diwrder, before the translations into the 
Western European languages were published. 

In this book of yours, you emphasize several times your 
disapproval of the role some of the members of the Dutch 
Communist Party have played in international politics. 

We, however, must protest against your making the Com- 
munist Party responsible for their deeds. It is utterly incor- 
rect. Moreover, it is unjust. For these members of the 
Dutch Communist Party hardly, or not at all, participated in 
the every-day fight of ou^ party ; also, directly or indirectly, 
they are trying to introduce oppositional slogans in the Com- 
munist Party, agaipst which the Dutch Party, and everyone 
of its organs, with all their energy, have fought and are fight- 
ing, up till to-day. 

Fraternally yours, 

{For the Dutch Delegation) 

D. J. Wijnkoop. 



